CONTENTS INSERTS Tables Page 1 TOP OF DOC 79-392PDF 2002 NORTH KOREA: HUMANITARIAN AND HUMAN RIGHTS CONCERNS HEARING BEFORE THE SUBCOMMITTEE ON EAST ASIA AND THE PACIFIC OF THE COMMITTEE ON INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES ONE HUNDRED SEVENTH CONGRESS SECOND SESSION MAY 2, 2002 Serial No. 107-95 Page 2 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Printed for the use of the Committee on International Relations Available via the World Wide Web: http://www.house.gov/international--relations COMMITTEE ON INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS HENRY J. HYDE, Illinois, Chairman BENJAMIN A. GILMAN, New York JAMES A. LEACH, Iowa DOUG BEREUTER, Nebraska CHRISTOPHER H. SMITH, New Jersey DAN BURTON, Indiana ELTON GALLEGLY, California ILEANA ROS-LEHTINEN, Florida CASS BALLENGER, North Carolina DANA ROHRABACHER, California EDWARD R. ROYCE, California PETER T. KING, New York STEVE CHABOT, Ohio AMO HOUGHTON, New York JOHN M. McHUGH, New York JOHN COOKSEY, Louisiana THOMAS G. TANCREDO, Colorado RON PAUL, Texas Page 3 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
NICK SMITH, Michigan JOSEPH R. PITTS, Pennsylvania DARRELL E. ISSA, California ERIC CANTOR, Virginia JEFF FLAKE, Arizona BRIAN D. KERNS, Indiana JO ANN DAVIS, Virginia MARK GREEN, Wisconsin TOM LANTOS, California HOWARD L. BERMAN, California GARY L. ACKERMAN, New York ENI F.H. FALEOMAVAEGA, American Samoa DONALD M. PAYNE, New Jersey ROBERT MENENDEZ, New Jersey SHERROD BROWN, Ohio CYNTHIA A. McKINNEY, Georgia EARL F. HILLIARD, Alabama BRAD SHERMAN, California ROBERT WEXLER, Florida JIM DAVIS, Florida ELIOT L. ENGEL, New York WILLIAM D. DELAHUNT, Massachusetts GREGORY W. MEEKS, New York BARBARA LEE, California Page 4 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
JOSEPH CROWLEY, New York JOSEPH M. HOEFFEL, Pennsylvania EARL BLUMENAUER, Oregon SHELLEY BERKLEY, Nevada GRACE NAPOLITANO, California ADAM B. SCHIFF, California DIANE E. WATSON, California THOMAS E. MOONEY, SR., Staff Director/General Counsel ROBERT R. KING, Democratic Staff Director Subcommittee on East Asia and the Pacific JAMES A. LEACH, Iowa, Chairman DANA ROHRABACHER, California BRIAN D. KERNS, Indiana CHRISTOPHER H. SMITH, New Jersey EDWARD R. ROYCE, California STEVE CHABOT, Ohio DARRELL E. ISSA, California JEFF FLAKE, Arizona MARK GREEN, Wisconsin ENI F. H. FALEOMAVAEGA, American Samoa SHERROD BROWN, Ohio JIM DAVIS, Florida Page 5 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
EARL BLUMENAUER, Oregon GARY L. ACKERMAN, New York GREGORY W. MEEKS, New York DIANE E. WATSON, California JAMES W. MCCORMICK, Subcommittee Staff Director ENERE LEVI, Democratic Professional Staff Member DOUGLAS ANDERSON, Professional Staff Member 
Norbert Vollertsen, former Medical Doctor inside North Korea Kim Sung Min, Defector and Director of North Korean Defectors' Volunteer Group, Committee to Help North Korean Refugees Sun-ok Lee, former prison and camp survivor Lee Young-Kook, former bodyguard of Kim Jong-II and prison camp survivor LETTERS, STATEMENTS, ETC., SUBMITTED FOR THE HEARING The Honorable James A. Leach, a Representative in Congress from the State of Iowa, and Chairman, Subcommittee on East Asia and the Pacific: Prepared statement The Honorable Eni F. H. Faleomavaega, a Representative in Congress from American Samoa: Prepared statement Sophie Delaunay: Prepared statement John Powell: Prepared statement Timothy A. Peters: Prepared statement Norbert Vollertsen: Prepared statement Page 7 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Kim Sung Min: Prepared statement Sun-ok Lee: Prepared statement Lee Young-Kook: Prepared statement APPENDIX The Honorable Henry J. Hyde, a Representative in Congress from the State of Illinois, and Chairman, Committee on International Relations: Prepared statement The Honorable Earl Blumenauer, a Representative in Congress from the State of Oregon: Prepared statement Article entitled ''Don't let North Korean softening obscure persistent hunger,'' The Christian Science Monitor, by Roberta Cohen Excerpts from ''Minimum conditions for humanitarian action in the DPRK: a survey of humanitarian agency involvement and perspectives,'' by Dr. Hazel Smith, Senior Fellow, Jennings Randolph Fellowship Program, United States Institute of Peace Article entitled ''DPR Korea: North Korean Refugees--An Escalating Crisis?'' by Aidan Foster-Carter, Hon. Senior Research Fellow in Sociology 
NORTH KOREA: HUMANITARIAN AND HUMAN RIGHTS CONCERNS THURSDAY, MAY 2, 2002 House of Representatives, Subcommittee on East Asia and the Pacific, Committee on International Relations, Washington, DC.
The Committee met, pursuant to call, at 10:15 a.m. in Room 2172, Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. James A. Leach [Chairman of the Subcommittee] presiding.
Mr. LEACH.
The Committee will come to order.
On behalf of the Subcommittee, I would like to warmly welcome our distinguished witnesses, many of whom have traveled from as far as Beijing and Seoul to be with us here today.
We're honored by your presence.
In this regard I would like to acknowledge the generous assistance of the Republic of Korea, the U.S. Embassy in Seoul, and the U.S. Committee for Human Rights North Korea in helping to make this hearing possible.
The leadership of two Members who have been instrumental in developing this hearing should also be singled out.
Representative Ed Royce who chairs the U.S.
South Korean Inter-Parliamentary Exchange and Representative Mark Kirk, who traveled to North Korea as a former staff member for this Committee and recently chaired a Congressional Human Rights Caucus briefing on North Korea.
Page 9 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The purpose of today's hearing is to examine a trio of increasingly significant humanitarian and foreign policy issues that have arisen as a direct consequence of North Korea's inhumane and failed system of governance.
All of which have important implications for the United States and the international community--refugees, acute food shortages, and human rights.
This hearing is particularly timely given the recent increase of North Korean asylum bids through western embassies in Beijing.
It also takes place against the sensitive diplomatic backdrop of renewed North-South dialogue, tentative steps toward re-engagement between Tokyo and Pyongyang, and the planned resumption of high-level dialogue between the United States and the DPRK.
Congress hopes and expects that North Korea will seize this opportunity to demonstrate its sincerity through negotiations and begin to alleviate the concerns of the world community.
As we've all come to understand, awareness of the plight of North Korean refugees is rising dramatically.
A series of high-profile instances in China, including in the last week two North Korean refugees gaining entry into the United States Embassy and the arrest of three asylum seekers outside the South Korean Embassy, has brought unprecedented exposure to a searing human rights tragedy largely heretofore hidden from the West.
The basic facts are as follows--the refugee issue first surfaced in connection with the appalling condition of DPRK contract laborers in Siberia.
By the mid-1990s, with economic collapse and natural disasters combining to create famine conditions in the North that may have claimed as many as 2 million lives, the focus shifted to China.
Over the last several years, somewhere between 100,000 and 300,000 North Koreans have crossed into northeastern China, a region with a large and welcoming community of ethnic Koreans.
Page 10 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Most of the North Koreans are in search of either food or work.
Many have evidently criss-crossed the border several times.
In recent years some refugees who have been repatriated to North Korea actually managed to escape and return to China.
Of this group an unknown number have suffered harsh punishment at the hands of the secret police, causing them to turn against the DPRK regime and therefore giving rise to well-founded fear of persecution should they be forcibly returned by the PRC to North Korea.
The PRC's reaction to the influx of North Koreans appears to fluctuate between placid tolerance and violent bouts of repression.
As a matter of principle, Beijing maintains that the North Koreans are economic migrants.
In practice, however, local authorities have allowed NGOs to assist refugees in China and even turned a blind eye to NGO efforts to facilitate their asylum to South Korea through third countries, provided such activities remain low-profile.
But Beijing also orders periodic crackdowns against the refugees and those who assist them, and by some reports may even allow DPRK agents to conduct operations in northeastern China.
While the flow of refugees in north China may be more stable than in years past, the number of defectors arriving in Seoul, while small in absolute numbers, is growing at an impressive rate.
The flow of North Korean asylum-seekers has surged from 149 in 1999, to 312 in 2000, to 583 last year, and this year defections are occurring in an accelerated rate.
Because North Korea cannot feed itself, U.N. agencies have become responsible for feeding almost a third of the country's 23 million people.
Page 11 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
A compassionate and global response to U.N. appeals for food and medical donations will almost certainly be needed to help protect women, children, and others at risk.
Finally, as to human rights, it should be clear that the North Korean regime is an abomination.
Its policy stands as an affront to the most basic standards of human decency.
President Bush is precisely correct to note that North Korea is starving its people while developing weapons of mass destruction.
Yet, he has been careful to observe that America has ''great sympathy and empathy for the North Korean people.
We want them to have food.''
The President has noted strongly, ''We want them to have freedom.''
How the U.S. and the world community can most effectively express its sympathy and concern for the North Korean people, including refugees in China, is the single issue before us today.
In this context we look forward to the testimony of our panelists, several of whom are outside experts, others survivors of some of the most challenging rigors of the human condition.
Mr. Faleomavaega? [The prepared statement of Mr. Leach follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE HONORABLE JAMES A. LEACH, A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS FROM THE STATE OF IOWA, AND CHAIRMAN, SUBCOMMITTEE ON EAST ASIA AND THE PACIFIC On behalf of the Subcommittee, I would like to warmly welcome our distinguished witnesses, many of whom have traveled from as far as Beijing and Seoul to be with us here today.
We are honored by your presence.
In this regard, I would like to acknowledge the generous assistance of the Republic of Korea, the U.S. Embassy in Seoul, and U.S. Committee for Human Rights in North Korea in helping to make this hearing possible.
The leadership of two Members who have been instrumental in developing this hearing should also be singled out: Representative Ed Royce, who chairs the US-South Korean Inter-parliamentary Exchange, and Representative Mark Kirk, who traveled to North Korea as a former staff member for this Committee and recently chaired a Congressional Human Rights Caucus briefing on North Korea.
Page 12 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The purpose of today's hearing is to examine a trio of increasingly significant humanitarian and foreign policy issues that have arisen as a direct consequence of North Korea's inhumane and failed system of governance, all of which have important implications for the U.S. and the international community: refugees, acute food shortages, and human rights.
This hearing is particularly timely given the recent increase of North Korean asylum bids through western embassies in Beijing.
It also takes place against the sensitive diplomatic backdrop of renewed North-South dialogue, tentative steps toward re-engagement between Tokyo and Pyongyang, and the planned resumption of high-level dialogue between the U.S. and the DPRK.
Congress hopes and expects that North Korea will seize this opportunity to demonstrate its sincerity through negotiations and begin to alleviate the concerns of the world community.
As we have all come to understand, awareness of the plight of North Korean refugees is rising dramatically.
A series of high-profile incidents in China, including in the last week two North Korean refugees gaining entry to the U.S. Embassy and the arrest of three asylum seekers outside the South Korean Embassy, has brought unprecedented exposure to a searing human rights tragedy largely heretofore hidden from the West.
The basic facts are as follows.
The refugee issue first surfaced in connection with the appalling condition of DPRK contract laborers in Siberia.
By the mid-1990s, with economic collapse and natural disasters combining to create famine conditions in the North that may have claimed as many as two million lives, the focus shifted to China.
Over the last several years, somewhere between 100,000 and 300,000 North Koreans have crossed into northeastern China, a region with a large and welcoming community of ethnic Koreans.
Most of the North Koreans are in search of either food or work.
Many have evidently criss-crossed the border several times.
In recent years some refugees who have been repatriated to North Korea actually managed to escape and return to China.
Of this group, an unknown number have suffered harsh punishment at the hands of the secret police, causing them to turn against the DPRK regime and therefore giving rise to a well-founded fear of persecution should they be forcibly returned by the PRC to North Korea.
Page 13 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The PRC's reaction to the influx of North Koreans appears to fluctuate between placid tolerance and violent bouts of repression.
As a matter of principle, Beijing maintains that the North Koreans are economic migrants.
In practice, however, local authorities have allowed NGOs to assist refugees in China and even turned a blind eye to NGO efforts to facilitate their asylum to South Korea through third countries, provided such activities remain low-profile.
But Beijing also orders periodic crackdowns against refugees and those who assist them, and by some reports may even allow DPRK agents to conduct operations in northeastern China.
While the flow of refugees into northern China may be more stable than in years past, the number of defectors arriving in Seoul--while small in absolute numbers--is growing at an impressive rate.
The flow of North Korean asylum seekers has surged from148 in 1999, to 312 in 2000, to 583 last year.
This year, defections are occurring at an accelerated rate.
Because North Korea cannot feed itself, UN agencies have become responsible for feeding almost one-third of the country's 23 million people.
A compassionate global response to UN appeals for food and medical donations will almost certainly be needed to help protect women, children and others at risk.
Finally, as to human rights, it should be clear that the North Korean regime is an abomination.
Its policies stand as an affront to the most basic standards of human decency.
President Bush is precisely correct to note that North Korea is starving its people while developing weapons of mass destruction.
Yet he has also been careful to observe that America has ''great sympathy and empathy for the North Korean people.
We want them to have food . . .
We want them to have freedom.''
Page 14 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
How the U.S. and the world community can most effectively express its sympathy and concern for the North Korean people, including refugees in China, is the signal issue before us today.
In this context, we look forward to the testimony of our panelists, several of whom are outside experts, others survivors of some the most challenging rigors of the human condition.
Mr. FALEOMAVAEGA.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I want to commend you for calling this hearing today to shed light on the tragic humanitarian plight of the North Korean people who labor under one of the repressive, totalitarian regimes in the world, the government of the Democratic Peoples Republic of Korea.
I'd also like to extend a warm welcome to our distinguished panel of witnesses; especially, those who have traveled from overseas to share their personal experiences with the Members of our Committee.
Mr. Chairman, many have advocated that the people of North Korea are the least free people on earth.
As over the past 4 decades, they have been denied the most basic of human rights.
They have been isolated from one another and they have been cut off from the world by their government.
Moreover, due to their government's disastrous agricultural and economic policies, which have been compounded by natural disaster, the North Korean people have suffered through a brutal famine that has killed well over a million, perhaps, up to 3 million of their own fellow citizens and left a generation of children physically and mentally stunted.
Mr. Chairman, the Assistant Secretary of State for Democracy and Human Rights and Labor, Lorne Craner, has recently testified that the North Korean government is among the most repressive regimes in the world.
The closed nature of the North Korean regime makes it difficult to obtain information on the conditions inside that country.
But the reports that make it out paint a shocking, often horrifying picture of brutality, opposition, injustice and depravation.
Page 15 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In North Korea individual rights are considered subversive to the goals of the state and the party.
There is no tolerance for criticism of the state or its leaders.
And accordingly, no freedom of expression, assembly or belief.
The regime uses extreme repression and a pervasive surveillance network to intimidate and instill fear in the population.
It maintains control through terror, threat of severe punishment and the manipulation of privileges, including the privilege of food allotments.
Given these terrible conditions in North Korea, Mr. Chairman, it's not surprising that tens of thousands of refugees, many of them malnourished women and children, have fled their homeland for northeast China.
It is estimated that well over 150,000 North Korean refugees currently live in China dreading forceful repatriation that would result in imprisonment, torture or execution.
On the issue of food aid, I'm proud of the World Food Program and resident NGOs that are continuing to provide humanitarian assistance on the ground in North Korea.
Due in part to their efforts, the North Korean people are continuing a fragile recovery from the famine crisis of 1997.
While better monitoring of food and aid distribution to prevent diversion still remains an important objective.
Much of the aid provided over the years has no doubt been effective in significantly reducing the numbers of North Koreans starving to death; especially within the targeted populations of children and women.
Mr. Chairman, I'm proud that our nation has continued to play a major donor role in coming to the assistance of the long-suffering people of North Korea.
This year alone the United States has contributed 155,000 metric tons of food to North Korea.
On that point, the Administration should be commended for continuing to separate issues of humanitarian assistance from the conflicts with the government of North Korea over weapons of mass destruction, conventional military forces and other matters.
Page 16 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Clearly, the innocent and powerless people of North Korea should not be condemned to starvation and made victims because of an unstable leadership they had no choice in choosing.
Concluding, Mr. Chairman, I'm heartened by the offer yesterday from Kim Jong-Il to re-engage with negotiations with Washington.
And I'm hopeful that Ambassador Jack Pritchard will be able to travel soon to North Korea to start addressing the full range of complex issues our nation has with North Korea.
And with that Mr. Chairman, I look forward to the opportunity of hearing from our witnesses this morning.
Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Faleomavaega follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE HONORABLE ENI F. H. FALEOMAVAEGA, A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS FROM AMERICAN SAMOA Mr. Chairman: I commend you for calling this hearing today to shed light on the tragic humanitarian plight of the North Korean people, who labor under one of the most oppressive totalitarian regimes in the world, the Government of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK).
Page 17 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I would also extend a warm welcome to our distinguished panel of witnesses, especially to those who have traveled from overseas to share their personal experiences with our Committee.
Mr. Chairman, many have advocated that the people of North Korea are the least free people on earth, as over the past four decades they have been denied the most basic of human rights, they have been isolated from one another, and they have been cutoff from the world by their government.
Moreover, due to their government's disastrous agricultural and economic policies, which have been compounded by natural disasters, the North Korean people have suffered through a brutal famine that has killed well over a million, perhaps up to three million, of their fellow citizens and left a generation of children physically and mentally stunted.
According to the 2001 State Department Human Rights Report on North Korea, ''The Government's human rights record remained poor, and it continued to commit numerous serious abuses.
Citizens do not have the right to peacefully change their government.
There continued to be reports of extrajudicial killings and disappearances.
Citizens are detained arbitrarily, and many are held as political prisoners; prison conditions are harsh . . .
The regime subjects its citizens to rigid controls.
The leadership perceives most international norms of human rights, especially individual rights, as illegitimate, alien, and subversive . . .
The Government prohibits freedom of speech, the press, assembly, and association . . .
The Government restricts freedom of religion, citizen's movements, and worker rights.''
To this effect, the Assistant Secretary of State for Democracy, Human Rights and Labor, Lorne Craner, has recently testified, ''The DPRK is among the most repressive regimes in the world.
The closed nature of the North Korean regime makes it difficult to obtain information on the conditions inside the country.
But the reports that make it out paint a shocking, often horrifying, picture of brutality, oppression, injustice and deprivation . . .
In North Korea, individual rights are considered subversive to the goals of the State and Party . . .
There is no tolerance for criticism of the State or its leader and accordingly no freedom of expression, assembly or belief . . .
The regime uses extreme repression and a pervasive surveillance network to intimidate and instill fear in the population.
It maintains control through terror, threat of severe punishment and the manipulation of privileges, including the 'privilege' of food allotments.''
Page 18 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Given these terrible conditions in North Korea, Mr. Chairman, it is not surprising that tens of thousands of refugees--many of them malnourished women and children--have fled their homeland for northeast China.
It is estimated that over 150,000 North Korean refugees currently live in China, dreading forcible repatriation that would result in imprisonment, torture or execution.
It is reprehensible that China, a party to the U.N. Refugee Convention of 1951, continues to deny UNHCR access to the border areas and assists DPRK security agents in pursuing and forcibly returning North Korean refugees.
I am particularly troubled by horror stories that some of the refugees returned have been led away like cattle, with wires forced through their noses and tied together.
On the issue of food aid, I applaud the World Food Program (WFP) and resident NGO's that are continuing to provide humanitarian assistance on the ground in North Korea.
Due in part to their efforts, the North Korean people are continuing a fragile recovery from the famine crisis of 1997.
While better monitoring of food aid distribution to prevent diversion still remains an important objective, much of the aid provided over the years has no doubt been effective in significantly reducing the numbers of North Koreans starving to death, especially with the targeted populations of children and women.
Mr. Chairman, I am proud that our Nation has continued to play a major donor role in coming to the assistance of the long-suffering people of North Korea.
This year alone, the United States has contributed 155,000 metric tons of food to North Korea.
On that point, the Administration should be commended for continuing to separate issues of humanitarian assistance from conflicts with the DPRK Government over weapons of mass destruction, conventional military forces and other matters.
Clearly, the innocent and powerless people of North Korea should not be condemned to starvation and made victims because of an unstable leadership they had no voice in choosing.
Page 19 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In concluding, I am heartened by the offer yesterday from Pyongyang to reengage in negotiations with Washington, and I am hopeful that Ambassador Jack Pritchard will be able to travel soon to the DPRK to start addressing the full range of complex issues our Nation has with North Korea.
Thank you Mr. Chairman for the opportunity to briefly comment and I look forward to the testimony of our distinguished witnesses.
Mr. LEACH.
Well, thank you very much.
Mr. Royce? Mr. ROYCE.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
I wanted to commend you for holding this hearing.
I guess it was several months ago---- Mr. LEACH.
If you will yield, this was at your request and I'm delighted that you made that request.
Mr. ROYCE.
Well, thank you.
Mr. LEACH.
I appreciate very much the leadership you've shown.
Mr. ROYCE.
Well, I thank you.
I appreciated the meeting we had with Congressman Kirk where we discussed the plight of the North Korean refugees, and so you've made this hearing a reality.
I think, as we'll hear today, the so-called Hermit Kingdom is one of the most brutal regimes that exists on this planet.
Page 20 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
As we have found out and as Congressman Kirk has found out, the elite there live in luxury while the people are starving.
North Korea is, thus, one of the greatest humanitarian disasters that we face.
And I want to thank all of the witnesses that are going to come here before us today on both panels because some of those witnesses endured great pain, great suffering, and they also demonstrated the greatest bravery.
This Subcommittee, I believe, is doing a great service by bringing attention to the nightmare that is North Korea for many, many people that are in that country that are starving as we speak.
Last year, along with Congressman Becerra, who co-Chairs the U.S.-Republic of Korea Inter-Parliamentary Exchange with me, and I introduced a resolution--House Concurrent Resolution 213, which addresses the plight of North Koreans, and especially, of the refugees of North Korea.
This resolution came out of Exchange discussions that we had last summer with our South Korean colleagues.
We each discussed the question of who is going to respond to this refugee crisis.
What is the world going to do about this humanitarian obligation? The resolution we developed calls on the Chinese government to honor its international obligations to honor the U.N. convention relating to the status of refugees of 1951 by providing asylum to North Korean refugees.
It also calls on Beijing to cooperate with the UNHCR to resettle these refugees in third countries.
Unfortunately, as we'll surely hear today, China is cooperating at this moment instead with North Korean authorities as they hunt down these refugees and subject them to the most brutal treatment imaginable, and we'd like to bring some international pressure to bear to change that.
Page 21 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
While the Chinese government's actions I think come as no surprise, we should continue to bring all the attention that we can to the issue of these refugees, and we should continue to urge Chinese cooperation to bring these refugees to safe ground.
China is not immune to international pressure.
So I would hope that this Committee would consider building on this hearing by moving this resolution, which is co-sponsored by several Members of the Committee, including Congressman Faleomavaega from American Samoa and Congressman Kirk of Chicago and myself.
So again, I thank you for this hearing in the interest of a very just humanitarian cause, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you.
Mr. Chabot, did you want to make any opening statement? Mr. CHABOT.
I'll be very brief, Mr. Chairman.
I want to thank you also for calling this hearing.
And I just coincidently happened over the last week just finish a book called the Aquariums of Pyongyang written by Kang Chol-Hwan, who spent 10 years, from the age of 9 until the age of 19 in one of the camps--Camp Yodok.
I'm not sure if I'm pronouncing that correctly.
It's Y-O-D-O-K, and it's called 10 Years in the North Korean Gulag.
The story he tells is shocking.
The brutality is really unbelievable--the inhumanity, the absence of basic human rights.
After being released from the camp, he subsequently escaped to the South and talks about it, but still has friends and family members and others and it's a shocking story that in the 21st Century that this sort of brutality is ongoing.
Page 22 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Again, I just want to thank the Chairman for holding this hearing and look forward to doing whatever we can to one day hopefully make those lives, which far to often they just live in the most unspeakable brutality imaginable.
But it's just totally inappropriate for human beings to be treated as those human beings were.
I appreciate the Chairman holding this hearing and I look forward to hearing the testimony this morning.
Mr. LEACH.
Well, thank you, Mr. Chabot.
Mr. Kirk? Mr. KIRK.
Thank you Mr. Chairman, and thank you for the invitation for a non-Committee Member.
I also want to thank Mr. Faleomavaega and Mr. Royce and my other colleagues.
As a staff member of this Committee, I spent quite a lot of time in North Korea, both in 1997 and '98.
I visited six major regions of North Korea, about 50 counties, all the way from Hui Jong on the Chinese border to Songgwan, near the DMZ.
I also want to commend Doug Anderson of this Committee staff who just spent, 4 weeks ago, a trip along the Chinese border looking at these issues.
Mr. Chairman, I believe that we have seen over the last 5 years a silent massacre in North Korea.
I estimate that approximately 2 million people have starved to death in North Korea since U.S. food assistance was started to alleviate the suffering there.
The suffering there is confirmed, not just by my visits and those of others to North Korea, but also of refugees who come over the border to China.
The faces of this famine are clear.
I met a young girl, Koch Kim Chin, in Hui Jong City Hospital.
She was 1 year old and weighed just 11 pounds.
In the Hui Jong Hospital Number 1, the following year, I met Kim Hui Bong, age 11, and she weighed just 35 pounds.
Page 23 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
When we think of North Korea, we think of missiles and other military maneuvers, but the Korea that I saw was a Korea without any windshield glass for trucks.
It was easy to see a North Korean truck driver because he would have bugs in his teeth.
The DPRK government has blamed this famine on wind, on floods, on rain, but really it's the government policy there.
Korea has never fed itself.
It has always survived off of food traded for goods from other countries and in the autocratic policy of today, Korea cannot feed itself.
Despite President Bush's characterization of North Korea as one of the axis of evil, the United States remains the number one donor of food to North Korea.
The U.S. is the number one donor of food to North Korea.
We feed every child in North Korea under the age of 15, 21 million meals a day, and I think we need to enhance that program.
We need to bring U.S. NGOs and U.S. NGO consortium back to Pyongyang to be partners with the world's food program.
We do all this under Ronald Reagan's theme articulated during the Ethiopian famine that a hungry child knows no politics.
But I think we should do more.
We should help out the refugees in China.
They are sometimes called Ggotjaebi, black swallows.
I met many of them.
The refugee children in Yanji in the province which contains 2 million ethnic Koreans.
It's there that those kids survive on scraps dropped from the marketplace stalls.
There are over 200,000 North Koreans in China.
I've started my own effort with my neighbors in Chicagoland.
We have formed the Korean-American Coalition of the Midwest.
Recently, Kraft has agreed to join our effort in our own privately-funded assistance plan for North Korea.
We will aid Korea in our own way, but we're also looking for something from the DPRK on non-proliferation, yes, but especially, on reunification.
Page 24 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
South Koreans are able to see their North Korean relatives in very limited numbers.
But Korean Americans have been totally unable to see their North Korean relatives.
We estimate that there are 500,000 American citizens who have relatives in North Korea.
I was very happy when Secretary Powell accepted their petition, now totalling 50,000 signatures to make sure that the reunification of Korean-Americans with their relatives in North Korea is accepted.
Mr. Chairman, I also think we need a new assistance project, and this is based on the suggestions of the Czech President, Vaclav Havel, who saw the powerful evidence by video cameras given to dissents within his country that recorded what happened.
I think the United States and private sector parties should fund video cameras give to refugees in China to then take back into North Korea to document what is happening there.
This will boost our assistance efforts and it will also boost our efforts to promote human rights in North Korea.
To everyone in the room, I say (Alionsayhow) and thank you for holding this hearing.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you, Mark.
Mr. Green, did you want to make an opening statement? Well, at this point, let me turn to our panelists.
Let me introduce Mr. Jasper Becker, was until this Monday, the Beijing Bureau Chief for the Hong Kong-based South China Morning Post newspaper.
He is a journalist and the author of acclaimed books on China, including The Chinese and Hungry Ghosts, an account of the great Chinese famine of the last century.
Page 25 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Ms. Sophie Delaunay is a regional coordinator for North Korea for Doctors without Borders, a respected humanitarian NGO.
Mr. John Powell is the regional director for the Asia region for the World Food Program.
Mr. Powell recently returned from a 2-week mission inside North Korea.
Mr. Timothy Peters is the founder and director of both Helping Hands Korea and a Ton-a-Month Club, two Seoul-based humanitarian organizations that attempt to provide assistance to North Koreans living both outside and inside North Korea, respectively.
We'll begin with the order of introduction with Mr. Becker.
And let me also ask if Mr. Young Lim, who is the translator for the witnesses that are here, if he could meet in the back of the room with staff.
That would be appreciated.
Thank you very much.
Mr. Becker, please proceed.
STATEMENT OF JASPER BECKER, FORMER BEIJING BUREAU CHIEF, SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST Mr. BECKER.
Thank you very much for inviting me.
I started writing about the North Korean famine just after I'd finished a book which looks at what happened in China during the great famine in the early '60s, and it became apparent from interviewing refugees inside China that this was an enormous famine because you had all the same signs that demonstrated the enormous scale of the famine China.
Page 26 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The North Koreans invited the international community to help with the famine in 1995.
But actually, it seemed that the famine started much earlier than that, and from the people that I'd spoken to, it seemed that famine began actually in the mid-1980s after collapse of some very big agricultural projects that the North Koreans had attempted after 1980.
And food rations began to get shorter and short.
And already in the early '90s, I think they asked for a World Food Program team to come in because they were already then thinking of calling for international aid.
This means that many of the people in North Korea have been on starvation rations really for over 12 years.
And they've been living on food substitutes, much as people did in China during the early 1960s.
Even after 7 years of food aid, the World Food Program said that in March people were just being distributed 300 grams of food a day when people should be getting at least 500 grams.
And you can see the evidence of the famine in the malnourished children who would come over the border and beg on the streets in Yanji and other parts of Chongjin province.
They look incredibly stunted.
People who say they are age 19 or 20 look like they are 12.
All the evidence suggests that these children who cross over are quite representative of the majority of children in North Korea who have grown up with long famine food shortages.
The big question as always in a famine is how many people have died, and there are very few statistics which are made available from the North Koreans, but it could be as high as 4 million people; perhaps, as much as a quarter of a population according to some sources.
Page 27 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Not only is, therefore, the North Korean famine unique in terms of the impact on this population, but it's also unique in its duration.
Most severe famines just last a couple of years, but this has now been going on now for, I would say, a decade.
The other question is which people have been most affected? Which are the people who have died in North Korea? According to the refugees, there are sort of different ways of looking at this, but one way is that most of the people who died first are those who belong to the classes which were considered less reliable, less politically loyal to the regime.
As you probably know, the North Korean population is divided up into classes according to their political loyalty.
This determination--this labeling also meant that those who are labeled disloyal would be the last in line for food.
So these people have been the most vulnerable.
Secondly, many of the refugees also say that the hardest hit areas have been those on the east coat, which have traditionally relied on surplus food being delivered from the area around Pyongyang on the west coast.
There are also stories that the food is being deliberately withheld from some areas in order to punish these areas for staging anti-government protest or rebellions or even military uprisings.
Again, this is very hard to verify.
The third peculiarity of the North Korean famine is that it's not been the rural areas, the poorer areas which have been hardest hit, but it's often been the urban residents who have been hardest hit because they haven't been getting food through the distribution system and because they haven't been able to function normally because of the economic collapse.
So most of the factories were closed.
Page 28 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
This, in turn, has lead to another common phenomenon in a big famine, a big movement of population when people leave their homes in search of food.
Many people have left the cities to go to the countryside to try and grow their own food.
But also, a lot of people have been going to China during the last 7 or 8 years to beg for food or to borrow money from their relatives there.
The border, which I've been along many times, is quite open and is quite easy to cross.
The fact that for the first time since the founding of North Korea, many people have been able to leave North Korea and to speak freely means that the refugees have provided a very unusual fund of knowledge and testimony about what actually goes on in North Korea.
They have been able to explain the causes of the famine to demonstrate that the famine is not caused by natural processes.
That the food distribution is somewhat different from that described by the World Food Program and many of the aid workers operating in North Korea.
They've also borne witness to the brutality of the regime.
The violent punishments which have been introduced in order to keep the population under control--a desperate population under control.
Although the Chinese government, the central government, has been launching these quite tough campaigns to round up people who have been living amongst the North Korean population in China, the local population--the ethnic Koreans have done a great deal to help their relatives and to help them escape and to keep, really, large numbers of people alive, even though, they, themselves, are extremely poor.
But the real sort of question mark that I think the refugees have raised is really what has gone with the aid relief effort.
It's been one of the largest and longest ever undertaken by the international aid community.
Their testimony has contradicted many of the statements by the World Food Program and its officials.
They've often denied that they've seen this food aid distributed.
They've said that it hasn't been going to the most vulnerable parts of the population and they continue to assert that the favorite members of the regime and the party--the army and the police and so on--have been the ones who are benefitting from this aid.
Page 29 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
This brings me to another point which I think is very relevant.
The food aid has partly been a failure because it's being used as a bargaining chip to negotiate security issues with North Korea.
It hasn't been used successfully to allow the humanitarian organizations--the NGOs, the WFP to do their job properly to go out and monitor that the food is going to the right people.
Secondly, the food aid has been a failure because its failed to be used to pushed the North Korean government into carrying out the essential economic reforms which would make the population self-sufficient in food and to revive the economy.
That leads one to the final conclusion that the international community is actually been failing the North Korea people.
Although, many countries have been extremely generous, it hasn't actually led to an end to the famine, which I believe is still going on.
And although the weakest part of the population has already died, I think a large number of people in North Korea are still extremely vulnerable and very short of food.
The final point I wanted to make is the relief effort and the international negotiations with the Korean government have failed and that leads one to a conclusion to ask whether the real solution to this problem is that the regime itself has to be replaced.
And until that has happened, it is difficult to see how this famine is ever going to be resolved.
Thank you very much.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you, Mr. Becker.
And let me say, without objection, all of our statements will be fully placed in the record.
So if you want to summarize, you are welcome to do that.
Ms. Delaunay? Page 30 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
STATEMENT OF SOPHIE DELAUNAY, NORTH KOREAN PROJECT REPRESENTATIVE, MEDECINS SANS FRONTIERES Ms. DELAUNAY.
Thank you Mr. Chairman for giving me the opportunity to testify before you in the name of Medecins Sans Frontieres or what you know as Doctors Without Borders or MSF and share with you our experience and understanding of the crisis affecting the North Korean people.
As you know, MFS ran medical and nutrition programs inside North Korea from 1995 to 1998.
Convinced that our aid was not reaching those most in need, MFS made the painful decision to withdraw from North Korea in September '98.
Since then, our organization has remained deeply concerned about the situation inside the country, and explored alternative ways to reach the most needy.
So today, I would like to say that we share most of the opinions which have been expressed by Jasper Becker today regarding the humanitarian situation in North Korea.
I would like to address two fundamental concerns regarding this situation of the North Korean people.
The first one is the lack of access of the most vulnerable population in North Korea to international aid.
The second concern is the lack of protection and assistance for North Korean refugees.
Regarding the first point on the lack of access of the most vulnerable, to this date, the vast majority of refugees who MFS has interviewed say they have never received food aid.
Anyone who has sat and talked with these refugees would find it really difficult to believe the assurance of the WFP, which is reporting that aid is saving millions of lives.
That the have access to the people and that they know where the aid is going.
Page 31 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
According to the refugees, as Jasper mentioned, after a decade-long food shortage in the country, those who remain are the survivors and only the strongest have learned to cope.
Even population groups, such as children, pregnant women and the elderly who are specifically targeted by the WFP for assistance are being denied food distribution.
In February 2002, an MSF team met with 12 North Korean children between the age of 6 and 15.
These children had recently arrived in China.
None of them had ever received food at primary school.
According to them, pupils have to bring their own lunch from home.
The same month a woman from Hyesan told us that, as a pregnant woman she was not entitled to any aid from the government.
She was 1 month from delivery and was forced to cross the border at night in sub-zero temperatures to get some help.
And in the same line several elderly people, who MFS interviewed, who belonged to the WFP target population, said they also did not benefit from any assistance.
For MSF, the testimonies of North Korean refugees raise serious questions about the way humanitarian assistance is delivered in North Korea.
From our point of view, two major weaknesses in the relief programs favor the exclusion of vulnerable populations from the aid system.
Those weaknesses are, first, the use of Public Distribution System or PDS to channel food aid; and the second is the quality of monitoring food aid.
As to the Public Distribution System, Jasper explained to you in North Korean society the three class labels, which are ''core,'' ''wavering,'' and ''hostile'' continue to be used to prioritize entitlement to items distributed to the PDS.
Everyone in North Korea, with the exception of cooperative farmers, depends on the PDS for the basic food rations.
Therefore, vulnerability and need have more to do with political and social standing than age and gender.
Age and gender is the criteria which is used by aid organizations to define target beneficiaries.
Page 32 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Since '98, MSF has denounced the fact that any assistance which was channeled through the PDS was discriminatory by nature.
We still believe that by using the PDS as the distribution channel for assistance, organizations are collaborating in organized government discrimination against its own citizens.
As with regard to the PDS and its function, according to individuals we have interviewed ordinary urban residents cannot rely on the PDS for their survival, and they are forced to find alternative ways to obtain food.
Erratic for years, the PDS came to a virtual standstill in the late '90s with meager distribution on major national holidays.
The second weakness that we would like to question is the quality of monitoring food aid.
MFS believes that after 7 years of massive international assistance to North Korea, monitoring conditions remain unacceptable.
North Korea still does not provide the complete list of beneficiary institutions and WFP teams are still barred from making spot checks.
The transparency of field inspections can also be questioned.
You can see in the testimonies at the end of these document that some refugees have witnessed U.N. visits and their testimonies raise questions over the way field inspections are organized, if not staged, by the North Korean partners.
From its experience and understanding of the North Korean system, MSF would like to reiterate that access by the population to the aid it needs can only be improved if there are independent needs assessments, independent distribution mechanisms, and independent monitoring by operating agencies.
Page 33 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
As with regard to the second concern we would like to address today, it's the lack of protection and assistance for North Korean refugees.
Once outside North Korea, challenges remaining for North Koreans seeking refuge outside.
Most North Korean refugees don't even contemplate reaching the South.
Instead, they cross the border into China in search of food for their families or for themselves or in search of a temporary job that will allow them to buy medicine or essential goods.
These refugees live in a very precarious situation in China and they are in urgent need of assistance.
Considered illegal migrants, they live in hiding and face the risk of being arrested at any time, then forcefully repatriated, and then subject to severe punishment in North Korea.
Fines and rewards discouraging Chinese citizens from assisting them and recent arrests of NGO workers illustrate how impossible it is to adequately provide effective humanitarian assistance there.
Numerous discussions between the MSF and the UNHCR about the need for protection have not proved fruitful.
July 2001 calls by MSF on the Chinese authorities to cease forced repatriations and allow humanitarian assistance for the refugees have not been answered.
The ongoing repression of North Korean refugees and of those who assist them limits the scope of our humanitarian operation on the Sino-Korean border.
You have to know that there may soon be no more refugees to tell you about North Korea.
As a conclusion, we would like to say the need for assistance to the North Korean people is acknowledged.
However, the testimonies of North Korean refugees confirm that despite this international relief assistance going into the country, a significant segment of the population remains in a precarious food situation.
Page 34 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
These testimonies also suggest that humanitarian assistance is not primarily directed at, nor reaching the most vulnerable.
Medecins Sans Frontieres expresses it grave concern over the endless suffering of the North Korean people and urges aid agencies operating inside North Korean to improve their monitoring and be responsible for the population they are entrusted to assist.
A second concern addresses the dire plight of North Koreans seeking refuge in China.
Medecins Sans Frontieres urges UNHCR and the Chinese government to open a dialogue leading to ensuring protection of North Korean refugees in China and to authorizing the provision of emergency assistance to the refugee population.
Thank you for your attention.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Delaunay follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF SOPHIE DELAUNAY, NORTH KOREAN PROJECT REPRESENTATIVE, MDECINS SANS FRONTIRES Mr. Chairman, thank you very much for giving me the opportunity to testify before you in the name of Mdecins Sans Frontires/Doctors Without Borders (MSF), and share with you our experience and understanding of the crisis affecting North Koreans in need of food assistance inside the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK) as well as of the plight of North Korean refugees in China.
Page 35 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
MSF operated inside North Korea from 1995 to 1998.
During this time, MSF attempted to supply drugs and provide medical training for approximately 1100 health centers, and to run 60 therapeutic feeding centers for malnourished children in three provinces of the country.
Convinced that, despite the best efforts of our field teams, our aid was not reaching those most in need of aid as intended, MSF made the painful decision to withdraw from North Korea in September 1998.
Since then, MSF has remained deeply concerned about the situation inside North Korea and explored alternative ways to reach the most needy.
MSF derives its current understanding of the humanitarian situation in North Korea from the following sources: North Korean refugees in China North Korean refugees in third countries Aid workers providing cross-border assistance Today, I would like to address two fundamental concerns regarding the disastrous humanitarian situation of the North Korean people.
The lack of access of the most vulnerable populations in North Korea to international aid The lack of protection and assistance for North Korean refugees LACK OF ACCESS OF THE MOST VULNERABLE POPULATIONS INSIDE NORTH KOREA TO INTERNATIONAL AID Page 36 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In October 2001, I described to a 40 year-old North Korean refugee how MSF used to provide aid in North Korea.
After listening to my explanation, he smiled at me and said, ''You cannot reach people like this . . .
You can't reach the common people.''
His comment illustrates the striking discrepancy in information between aid agencies present in North Korea and aid workers assisting North Korean refugees about whether aid is reaching its intended targets.
This has been a characteristic of the North Korean crisis for the past 7 years.
MSF itself experienced such a divergence when in 1998, the extent of the famine described by the refugees that MSF met on the Chinese border could not be observed by its teams operating in the DPRK.
This was due to the restrictions imposed by the North Korean government on the ability of aid organizations to independently assess humanitarian needs.
To this day, the vast majority of refugees who MSF has interviewed say they have never received food aid.
This includes those belonging to the target beneficiaries of the United Nations program.
Anyone who has sat and talked with these refugees would find it difficult to believe the assurances of the World Food Program (WFP), which is reporting that aid is saving millions of lives, and that they have access to monitor and know where the aid is going.
North Korea has been one of the largest recipients of food aid in the world for a number of years, yet it is still a great challenge for vulnerable populations to access food.
Despite increased border controls, some North Koreans, mostly from the northern provinces, continue to cross into China in search of the means to survive.
According to the refugees MSF has interviewed, the food situation remains critical for most of the ordinary people in North Korea.
In their own words, after a decade-long food shortage in the country, those who remain are survivors and only the strongest have learned to cope.
Page 37 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Even population groups such as children, pregnant women, and the elderly, who are specifically targeted by the WFP for assistance, are being denied food distribution.
In February 2002, an MSF team met with 12 North Korean children between the ages of 6 and 15 who had recently arrived in China.
None of them had ever received food at primary school.
According to them, pupils have to bring their own lunch from home.
Children are often unable to attend school because they are simply too weak or too busy providing for their own sustenance.
The same month, a woman from Hyesan told us that, as a pregnant woman she was not entitled to any aid from the government.
She was one month from delivery and was forced to cross the border at night in sub-zero temperatures to get some help.
Several elderly people who MSF interviewed, who belonged to the WFP target population, said they also did not benefit from any assistance.
Testimonies from refugees and aid workers who are carrying out cross-border assistance largely deny that farmers are better off and can benefit from the crops they grow.
A bad harvest combined with a required quota deducted by the government does not leave much for the rural populations to rely on.
Despite the irregular functioning of the Public Distribution System in urban areas, it seems that cities offer survival alternatives that cannot be found in rural areas, including widespread black markets.
For MSF, the testimonies of North Korean refugees raise serious questions about the way humanitarian assistance is delivered in North Korea.
From our point of view, two major weaknesses in the relief programs favor exclusion of vulnerable populations from the aid system.
Those weaknesses are: -- The use of the Public Distribution System (PDS) to channel food aid; and, Page 38 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
-- The quality of monitoring food aid.
THE PUBLIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM In North Korean society, the three class labels--''core,'' ''wavering,'' and ''hostile''--continue to be used to prioritize access to jobs, region of residence, and entitlement to items distributed through the Public Distribution System (PDS).
Everyone in North Korea, with the exception of cooperative farmers, depends on the PDS for the basic food rations they require for survival.
Therefore, vulnerability and need have more to do with political and social standing than age and gender, the criteria used by aid organizations to define target beneficiaries.
As early as 1998, MSF denounced the fact that any assistance channeled through the PDS was discriminatory by nature.
By using the PDS as the distribution channel for assistance, organizations are collaborating in organized government discrimination of its own citizens based on politics instead of needs.
''Last time I received food from the PDS was in 1997, only once that year.
I received according to my ration ticket.
Everyone has different amounts,'' testified a 20 year-old man from Hoeryong city last October.
According to individuals we interviewed, ordinary urban residents cannot rely on the PDS for their survival and are forced to find alternative ways to obtain food.
Erratic for years, the PDS came to a virtual standstill in the late 90's with meager distribution on major national holidays.
Page 39 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
THE QUALITY OF MONITORING FOOD AID After 7 years of massive international assistance to North Korea, monitoring conditions remain unacceptable.
North Korea still does not provide the complete list of beneficiary institutions and WFP teams are still barred from making spot checks.(see footnote 1) Random access for assessment purposes appears to be impossible, calling into question the transparency of field inspections.
Some refugees have witnessed UN visits and their testimonies raise questions over the way field inspections are organized, if not staged, by the North Korean partners.
From its experience and understanding of the North Korean system, MSF would like to reiterate that access by the population to the aid it needs can only be improved if there are independent needs assessments, independent distribution mechanisms, and independent monitoring by operating agencies.
THE LACK OF PROTECTION AND ASSISTANCE FOR NORTH KOREAN REFUGEES Once outside North Korea, challenges remain for North Koreans seeking refuge outside their country.
Most North Korean refugees do not even contemplate reaching South Korea.
Instead, they cross the border into China in search of food for their families, or a temporary job that will allow them to buy medicines or other essential goods needed at home.
These refugees live in a precarious situation in China and are in urgent need of assistance.
Considered illegal migrants by the Chinese authorities, they live in hiding and face the risk of being arrested at any time, forcefully repatriated, and subject to severe repercussions in North Korea.
Border rules posted along the Tumen River in Chinese and Korean stipulate that, ''It is forbidden to financially help, allow to stay, harbor, or aid in the settlement of people from the neighboring country who have crossed the border illegally.''
Page 40 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Fines and rewards(see footnote 2) discouraging Chinese citizens from assisting North Korean refugees and recent arrests of foreign NGO workers illustrate how impossible it is to adequately provide effective humanitarian assistance.(see footnote 3) Only a handful of refugees manage to reach a third country, where they continue to face the risk of being arrested anytime as illegal migrants during their 3-to-4-month screening process.
Up to now, none of the 1988 North Korean defectors who have been resettled in South Korea have been granted refugee status.
5000 to 10000 Rmb for helping NK refugees.
Rewards : 30 RMB for denouncing shelter 50 Rmb for denouncing a refugee 100 Rmb for taking a refugee to the Chinese police station *Information collected by an aid worker at the border in July 2001.
(8Rmb = $1 USD) Numerous discussions between MSF and the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR) about the need for protection have not proved fruitful.
July 2001 calls by MSF on the Chinese authorities to cease forced repatriations and allow humanitarian assistance for the refugees have not been answered.
The ongoing repression of North Korean refugees and of those who assist them limits the scope of any humanitarian operation on the Sino-Korean border.
There may soon be no more refugees to tell you about North Korea.
Page 41 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
CONCLUSION The need for assistance to the North Korean people is widely acknowledged.
Testimonies of North Korean refugees confirm that despite massive international relief going into the country, a significant segment of the population remains in a precarious food situation.
These testimonies also suggest that humanitarian assistance is not primarily directed at, nor reaching, the most vulnerable populations.
Mdecins Sans Frontires expresses its grave concern over the endless suffering of the North Korean people and urges aid agencies operating inside North Korea to improve their monitoring and be responsible for the populations they are entrusted to assist.
A second concern addresses the dire plight of North Koreans seeking refuge in China.
Mdecins Sans Frontires urges UNHCR and the Chinese government to open a dialogue leading to ensuring protection of North Korean refugees in China, and the provision of emergency assistance to the refugee population.
Thank you for your attention APPENDIX ADDITIONAL TESTIMONIES OF NORTH KOREAN REFUGEES 1.
Statements regarding reasons for crossing the border Man, 35, from Hoeryong city, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in October 2001: Page 42 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
''There are rich people in North Korea too.
People who are poor, who just eat corn, come here [to China].
The rich, who have the rice, they don't need to come here.
For them, we are bad, traitors.''
Boy, 18, from Sampong city, Musan county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in July 2001: ''I came to China in June 2001 because I had nothing to eat, my mother died and my father is sick.''
Peasant, 40, from Onsong county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''Me and my wife came to China because we were starving.''
Women, 43, from Aoji coal mine, Eundok county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''We have the choice between dying from starvation or dying in the hands of the police after being arrested.
Anyhow we may die so we come to China, at least we can please our stomach there.''
''If somebody has a high position in North Korea, he does not have any problem.
If I was in a high position, I would not need to come to China.''
2.
Statements regarding pregnant women's access to aid Pregnant women, 31, from Hyesan county, Ryanggang Province.
Interview conducted in February 2002: Page 43 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
''I am pregnant and I will deliver next month.
As a pregnant woman I am not entitled to any aid from the government.
No pregnant women ever receive any.
Until the end of the 80s, pregnant women would receive food during their hospitalization.''
Women suffering from tuberculosis, 33, from Chongjin city, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in February 2002: ''Pregnant women do not benefit from government care.
Well so they say but . . . when the third child is born, a 300 g ration of food is distributed in his name.
After that there is nothing for the child nor for the mother.''
3.
Statements regarding elderly access to aid Man, retired from the Workers Party, 50, from Aoji coal mine, Eundok county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''After I retired, me and my wife have not got any income.
We don't ask too much, not even rice.
But even corn soup we cannot always have.''
Retired couple from the Workers Party, 60 
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''When you're over 61 years old you're unable to work because of the age limit.
But right now in North Korea, they write the [retirement] annuity on a piece of paper.
With that you can get 600 g of rice for one day but it is only a piece of paper, and I never receive anything, and I cannot eat the paper, we are not goats.
I never get any distribution nor any grant and I never receive a wage.
If people in the coal mines don't receive any food, how can old people like us receive any?'' Page 44 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
4.
Statements regarding food availability for farmers Couple of farmers, 49 and 45, from Eundok county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in October 2001: ''We came to China because we were in difficulties so we came here to get some help.
We had a bad harvest, no PDS, it's hard to get food, so we came here along.''
Peasant, 40, from Onsong county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''Before we used to receive some distribution of crops, but nowadays there are not enough crops.
Although we plant crops for the year it is not even enough for peasants.
On the top of that we have to provide crops to the workers office.
There are only 3 to 4 months a year when we have enough crops to eat.
Most of the crops are provided to the army base.''
Farmer, 40, from Onsong county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''Once they tax everything there is not much left for us to eat.''
Retired couple from the Worker's Party, 60 
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''Right now farmers cannot even produce enough food for themselves.
There are several reasons why; there isn't any fertilizer and farmers don't have energy to work because they don't have anything to eat.''
Page 45 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Pregnant women, 31, from Hyesan county, Ryanggang Province.
Interview conducted in February 2002: ''People living in the cities are always better off than those from the countryside.
In the city, they can always manage to beg.
In the countryside, there is nothing but the grass for the rabbits.''
5.
Statements regarding the functioning of the PDS Couple of farmers, 49 and 45, from Eundok county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in October 2001: ''The PDS stopped in 95-96 but we still have to keep working'' Man, 23, from Musan county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in July 2001: ''In North Korea the only source of food is PDS, if there is no food ration, there is no other source of food.
But you know, since I began to have hair on my head, I have never seen food ration on a regular basis, so it was erratic already after my birth and PDS has always been a major problem for the people.''
Woman, 50, from Sampong district, Onsong county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''The government does not supply any food to the population nowadays, and says to them that 'although we only have water and fresh air, we have to keep our ideology.'
They just leave on corn soup in my hometown.
They get the corn from merchants from Chongjin who make profit out of it.''
Page 46 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Woman, 50, from Sampong district, Onsong county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''In 1997, on April 15, Kim Il Sung's birthday, I received 3 kg of corn from the US.
Every family also got 10 kg of potatoes from China on October 10th, 1998 for the Worker's Party foundation day.
Besides those two cases, we did not get anymore from the PDS.
And the government announced to citizens that no more food would be provided so they should not expect anything from the government and that everybody had to manage their life by themselves.''
Woman, 30, from Aoji, Eudok county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''Since 1995 I have only received food from PDS once or twice a year for Kim Il Sung's and Kim Jung Il's birthdays.''
Retired couple from the Worker's Party, 60 
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''We just receive food from PDS for anniversaries in January1, February 16, April 15, a ration for 3 days.''
Man, 35, from Aoji, Eundok county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''I gave up my job in the 7.7 fertilizer factory because there wasn't any food distribution.''
Pregnant woman, 31, from Hyesan, Ryanggang Province.
Interview conducted in February 2002: Page 47 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
''In theory the PDS should distribute 800g/day/person.
But since the 80's, the rations have officially been reduced to 4-5 months.
Even though it is fixed like that, the PDS is corrupted and this quantity has not been provided.
We receive much less than that.
The decrease in rations is always justified by the need to help the army or because the agricultural program did not succeed.''
6.
Statements regarding visits of UN inspectors Man, 23, from Musan county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in July 2001: ''I have seen some foreign guys from the UN traveling around.
I don't know what they are doing but when they are traveling, just around this time, government suddenly becomes very busy, you know, try to find those undernourished boys and children . . .
They keep them away, you know, those undernourished children, at some place . . .
Perhaps they were expecting that these UN guys visit welfare facilities inspection, so they want to be prepared for it.''
Man, 19, from Hamheung city, South Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''Last year I saw UN guys coming to Musan to assess flood damage.
The government dug up the river and the streets to make it look more damaged, in order to get more rice.
The UN investigators came back to Musan a number of times.''
7.
Statements regarding forced repatriation and related punishment in North Korea Page 48 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Boy, 16, from North Pyongan Province.
Interview conducted in July 2001: ''I was arrested a few month ago in China, put in jail, then sent to North Korea where I was kept in a childrens camp in Heoryong.
I escaped again to come back to China.''
Man, 23, from Musan county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in July 2001: ''I was detained in a Chinese detention center in Hunchun in January 2000 then sent back to North Korea with another group of North Koreans.
We were handcuffed until we reached Saepiol and then we were blindfolded and taken to a camp.
I learned from my cellmates later on that we were in Chongjin.
In the camp it was very hard and I have been tortured, but after I mentioned my aunt was working in the North Korean anti South Korean intelligence, I was released.''
Woman, 50, from Sampong district, Onsong county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''My son was already arrested and repatriated 3 times from China, therefore he will stay in jail for 5 years.
Citizens know that if they are caught leaving the country, the first time they have to stay in jail one year, the second time 3 years.
I myself was arrested for leaving the country without permission last year in July.
I was taken to Chongjin city jail where I only stayed one month because it was too crowded and there was not enough space in the jail.
There were 120 males and 178 females there, all of them had been arrested for escaping the country.''
8.
Statements regarding the manipulation of foreign aid Page 49 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Man, 23, from Musan county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in July 2001: ''The rice and corn in the market are in foreign packages, it is the food that arrives in Korea from good people like you.
Then those bastards of senior party members are taking them into their home and their big bellies, but since they cannot sell the things themselves at the market, then they send their wife to do the job.
I can precisely tell you that the things are from foreign countries because I often go to the port in Chongjin.
A lot of cereals are being unloaded there.
We saw all kinds of grains and foreign ships.
And sometimes we see the American flag and the package label.
So I can precisely say where the cereals we find in the market come from.''
Woman, 50, from Sampong district, Onsong county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''Citizens know that a lot of relief supply is coming to North Korea from other countries.
We have heard about it.
But most of the time we never got any of those supplies, so we think that the government keeps for themselves.''
Man, 20, from Chongjin city, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in April 2001: ''I have been to the black market recently, I have seen bags of corn there.
It had a US flag on the top and it was written that it was a gift from the US.''
Mine worker, 46, from Saepiol county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''We heard that soldiers in the army still eat 3 meals a day, 2 meals of rice and one meal of porridge.
To the army, the food goes to the army.
The rice is used to make oil and turned into gunpowder.
From what I heard, the army base has about 80-90% go to the army and the rest is sent to the people.
At the army factory they use glutinous rice powder to make gunpowder.
Or the glutinous rice or corn or peas can be used to produce oil.
Or candy powder can be used as well.''
Page 50 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Man, 36, from Rason, Eundok county, North Hamkyong Province.
Interview conducted in February 2001: ''If you listen to the [South Korean] radio it says how much rice is brought into the country from South Korea, Japan and America.
500,000 tons came into Nampo harbor and other places.
But in reality the amount of our ration is one or two days worth, sometimes a week worth.
After that there is no more.
So I start to wonder if we really got that rice and if the South Korean radio is lying.
I think about that sometimes: if the rice came in, why is no one giving it to the people?'' Mr. LEACH.
Well, thank you very much, Ms. Delaunay.
Mr. Powell? STATEMENT OF JOHN POWELL, REGIONAL DIRECTOR, WORLD FOOD PROGRAM Mr. POWELL.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
I would like to thank this congressional panel for invitation to speak with you about the food situation in North Korea.
The timing of the hearing is opportune because I've recently returned from a 13-day mission to that country.
The purpose of that mission was to take stock of our emergency operation in North Korea.
During the mission, I visited WFP sub-offices in Sinuiju, Hamhung, Chonqjin, Hyesan and Wonsan as well as Pyongyang.
I saw WFP activities in each of these areas, visiting orphanages, nurseries, kindergartens, primary schools, pediatric hospitals and food for work activities.
I spoke with pregnant women, nursing mothers and the elderly.
I also met with government officials at national, provincial and county levels.
Page 51 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Let me, if I may, Mr. Chairman, share with you a few snapshots of what we saw.
Power--the lack of power is evident everywhere, especially in the industrial sector where factories lie idle, causing considerable unemployment and underemployment, particularly in the northeast of the country.
Lack of power and other inputs means less fertilizer, less fertilizer means less food production.
Hillside and urban agriculture--we saw farmers preparing land for planting on slopes where it was quite impossible to stand erect.
This land should be under forest cover, not under cultivation.
In urban areas we saw land cultivated from the roadside to the very edge of apartment buildings.
In rural areas, the few meters of land around the house are intensely cultivated, including on the roofs.
Children's nutrition--there was a visible improvement in the health status of children.
We no longer saw evidence of the widespread, acute malnutrition seen in previous years.
Children in kindergartens and primary schools were active and alert.
A far cry form the reports of just a few years go when children were visibly lethargic and with the usual signs associated with the existence of famine--orange hair, skin discoloration and so on.
Primary schools--we spoke with a 70-year old principal of a primary school who said that school attendance had increased from 75 to 95 percent since the introduction of WFP biscuits.
Primary school children, some 1.4 million of them make up the largest number people who receive WFP assistance.
So while great strides have been made in reducing levels of acute malnutrition, the kind most associated with famine, chronic malnutrition remains at unacceptably high levels.
It is estimated that more than 40 percent of children under 5 are malnourished because even with full WFP rations the children may not be getting enough food.
Page 52 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
On the issue of the alleged diversion of WFP food assistance to the military, let me be direct.
The army takes what it wants from the national harvest up front, in full.
It takes it in the form of food Koreans prefer--Korean rice.
The food that WFP provides is overwhelmingly maize or wheat, or in 2001, Japanese brown rice--commodities not preferred by those in power.
They do not need to take WFP food, nor have we seen any evidence that they do.
As to monitoring, WFP has its' main office in Pyongyang and five sub-offices located throughout the country.
We have some 50 international staff who together make between 300 to 400 monitoring visits every month of the year.
They visit all types of institutions through which WFP food is distributed.
Often it is nurseries, kindergartens, pediatric hospitals, schools--primary and secondary.
They do all the things that I did, and they always speak with those who are receiving the food.
As a result, we have amassed a considerable amount of observable data during our 7 years in the country.
And when we have concerns about food distribution, we do something about it.
In 2000, for example, we cut out the general hospital feeding program because we were not sufficiently confident that the food was reaching those for whom it was intended.
And, in 2001, we did not proceed with a 92,000 ton relief and recovery operation because we could not reach agreement with the authorities on the number of additional staff that WFP would need to properly monitor the operation.
So like in WFP operation anywhere in the world, we do not know where each and every bag of food is going, but we do have a reasonable degree of assurance that the food provided through WFP gets to those who need it.
Page 53 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Yes, we still have a long way to go to lift our monitoring standards in North Korea to the same level as they are in most other countries.
Let me explain the main reasons why we are not satisfied.
We are not satisfied because we do not yet have access to all of the counties to assess needs and to provide food to those who need it.
Our ''no access no food'' policy means, we think, that many people in genuine need of food assistance are not reached.
We are not satisfied because we are unable to make random spot checks.
We are not satisfied because we are not permitted to bring Korean speakers into North Korea as WFP staff members.
And we want to have access to farmers markets to have a better understanding of the relative price of food commodities bought, sold or barter.
These are matters that we are taking up consistently and persistently with the authorities.
This being said, we have come a long way with the DPRK authorities over the past 4 years as some degree of trust and confidence has been built.
Some of these milestones include the establishment of five WFP sub-offices throughout the country and 50 international staff, many of whom are located in those sub-offices.
WFP is the only agency to have access to so many counties--some 163 of 206.
And to have staff permanently assigned outside of Pyongyang.
The number of counties to which we have access has increased from 145 in 1998 to 163 in 2002.
This means that we can now reach more people who need help, about 85 percent of the population.
Since 2000, WFP international staff have been able to take Korean language training lessons in Pyongyang.
A few have a pretty fair grasp of the language and can at least detect when interpretation is not accurate.
Page 54 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The government has agreed to a new nutrition survey to follow up the 1998 nutrition survey.
This has been a longstanding issue on our agency and the government's agreement is a big step forward.
A technical proposal for the conduct of the survey is now with the authorities.
The government has reaffirmed its commitment given last year to provide WFP with the full list of institutions through which WFP food assistance is provided.
This arrangement will enable us to increase the randomness of our monitoring.
It is, of course, not the same thing as random access, but it is progress.
The authorities have informed us that this list is to be made available shortly.
The 1998 nutrition survey found that 62 percent of children under the age of 7 years were suffering from chronic malnutrition.
The kind that arises from eating insufficient nutritious food day in, day out over a protracted period.
That same survey showed that about 16 percent of children were acutely malnourished.
The kind that is usually associated with the existence of famine.
WFP does not have the luxury of saying that it will leave because our minimum operational conditions are not met.
We need to remain engaged and persevere and to work toward achieving those conditions.
They will not be met if we all simply pull out.
And the resultant suffering for the country's most vulnerable would verge toward the unimaginable.
We remain optimistic that with persistent principled negotiation, and the support of the international community, much more progress can be made.
And no gain achieved has been later taken back.
Page 55 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
As to resources, WFP will run out of food in July or August this year unless new pledges are made urgently.
The urgency aries because it takes 2 to 4 months to translate a pledge from a donor to food into the stomach of child in North Korea.
Beginning this month, we're having to eliminate the distribution of food to some 675,000 secondary school children.
Some 350,000 of the elderly will not receive food rations through WFP.
Care givers in institutions, 144,000 of them, mainly women, will not receive WFP rations.
And food-for-work will be sharply cut back, therefore, reaching far fewer urban underemployed in the northeast; perhaps, affecting a half a million people.
Some 1.5 million people will not get the food because of the shortfall.
Doing this will stretch the reach of our support to pregnant women, nursing mothers and young children for a few more months.
It will not be enough to meet their requirements for the year.
And those recipients of WFP food assistance will therefore have to rely on a public distribution system that cannot cope.
That system will provide her with perhaps 200 to 250 grams of cereal a day or about half the ration of a refugee in a camp in any country in the world.
Without that food, the prospects are chilling.
Those who rely on WFP assistance are looking down the barrel of the food crisis.
Before closing, on behalf of WFP I would like to thank the people of the United States for their unstinting generosity for the most vulnerable people in North Korea--their women and children.
The United States has already contributed some 155,000 metric tons of food to our emergency operation for 2002.
Without this food, the situation would be much more serious; and it would have become so much earlier.
It has been a major contributor to our emergency operations over all the years of our work in North Korea.
Page 56 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The United States has also been a strong and clear voice in support of the kinds of measures that we would like to see to further improve the operational performance of our work; and in improving the working conditions of our staff.
And perhaps, most importantly, the United States has consistently shown the commitment to separate its political agenda from humanitarian concerns, holding true to the principle spelled out by former President Reagan, ''A hungry child knows no politics.''
This is not always an easy principle to follow; and we admire you for being able to do so.
Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Powell follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN POWELL, REGIONAL DIRECTOR, WORLD FOOD PROGRAM CONGRESSIONAL PANEL PRESENTATION On behalf of the World Food Programme I would like to thank this Congressional Panel for the invitation to speak with you about the food situation in DPR (North) Korea.
The timing of the hearing is opportune because I have recently returned from a 13 day Mission to North Korea.
The purpose of the Mission was to take stock of our emergency operation in the country.
During that Mission I visited WFP Sub-Offices in Sinuiju, Hamhung, Chonqjin, Hyesan and Wonsan; as well as Pyongyang.
I saw WFP activities in each of these areas, visiting orphanages, nurseries, kindergartens, primary schools, pediatric hospitals and food for work activities.
I spoke with pregnant women, nursing mothers and the elderly.
I also met with Government Officials at National, Provincial and County level.
Page 57 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Let me share with you a few snapshots of what we saw: Power--the lack of power is evident everywhere, especially in the industrial sector where factories sit idle, causing considerable unemployment and underemployment, particularly in the Northeast of the country.
Lack of power and other inputs also means less fertilizer, which means less food production.
Lack of power means very little light, especially in the winter; and the hand-carrying of water, whether in rural settings or in apartment buildings in the urban areas.
It is a huge problem for hospitals; and not much less for the citizens of the country.
It also causes problems for our local food production where limited and erratic power supply means that often the factory equipment cannot function.
Hillside and urban agriculture--we saw farmers preparing land for planting on slopes where it was quite impossible to stand erect.
This is land that should be under forest cover, not under cultivation.
Yet a clear sign that any land on which food could be produced--however tenuously--would be used, despite the negative impact on the environment that this practice causes--including increased vulnerability to flooding.
In urban areas we saw land cultivated from the roadside to the very edge of the apartment buildings.
In rural areas, the few metres of land around the houses are intensely cultivated--including on the roofs.
Children's nutrition--there was a visible improvement in the health status of the children.
We no longer saw evidence of the widespread acute malnutrition seen in the previous years.
Children in kindergartens and primary schools were active and alert.
A far cry from the reports of just a few years ago, when children were visibly lethargic and with the usual signs associated with the onset of famine--orange hair and skin discolorations.
Page 58 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Primary schools--we spoke with a 70 year old Principal of a primary school who said that student attendance had increased from 75% to 95% since the introduction of WFP biscuits.
And the schoolteachers, who also received the biscuits, were more regular in their attendance and more active with the children.
Primary school children--some 1.4 million of them--make up the largest number of people who receive WFP food assistance.
So, while great strides have been made in reducing the levels of acute malnutrition, the kind most associated with famine, chronic malnutrition remains at unacceptably high levels.
It is estimated that more than 40% of children under 5 remain malnourished because even with the full WFP rations the children may not be getting enough food.
On the issue of the alleged diversion of WFP food assistance to the military, let me be direct.
The army takes what it wants from the national harvest up front, in full.
And it takes it in the form of food Koreans prefer: Korean rice.
The food that WFP provides is overwhelmingly maize or wheat (or, in 2001, Japanese ''brown rice''), commodities not preferred by those in power.
They do no need to take WFP food.
Nor have we any evidence that they do.
As to monitoring, WFP has its' main Office in Pyongyang and five Sub-Offices located throughout the country.
We have some 50 international staff who together make between 300-400 monitoring visits every month of the year.
They visit all of the types of institutions through which WFP food is distributed-orphanages, nurseries, kindergartens, pediatric hospitals and schools, both primary and secondary.
They visit pregnant women and nursing mothers at home, as they do the elderly.
They visit Food-for Work sites.
And always they speak with those who are receiving the food.
Page 59 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
As a result we have amassed a considerable amount of observational data during our seven years in the country.
And when we have concerns about the food distribution we do something about it.
In 2000, for example, we cut out the general hospital feeding progamme because we were not sufficiently confident that the food was reaching those for whom it was intended.
And, in 2001, we did not proceed with a 92,000 tonnes Relief and Recovery Operation because we could not reach agreement with the Authorities on the number of additional staff that WFP would need to properly monitor that Operation.
So, like in any WFP operation anywhere in the world, we do not know where each and every bag of food is going but we do have a reasonable degree of assurance that the food provided through WFP gets to those who need it.
Yet we still have a long way to go to lift our monitoring standards in North Korea to the same level as they are in most other countries.
Let me explain the main reasons why we are not satisfied.
We are not satisfied because we do not yet have access to all of the counties to assess needs and to provide food to those who need it.
Our ''no access no food'' policy means, we think, that many people in genuine need of food assistance are not reached.
We are not satisfied because we are not able to make random spot checks.
This diminishes the effectiveness of any set of monitoring arrangements.
We are not satisfied because we are not permitted to bring Korean speakers into North Korea as WFP staff members, which means that we do not have the opportunity to interact directly with those who receive WFP food assistance.
And we want to have access to farmers markets to have a better understanding of the relative price of the food commodities bought, sold or bartered.
These are matters that are taken up consistently--and persistently--with the Authorities.
Other matters of special concern to us relate to the working conditions of WFP staff in the country, especially in the Sub-Offices.
We do not yet have a medical evacuation procedure agreed with the Authorities, placing staff members--and their supervisors--in a very uncomfortable position.
After the completion of the daily monitoring visits, our staff working in the Sub-Offices used to not have much freedom of movement outside of the grounds of the hotels in which they were accommodated without prior permission; and even then they were to be accompanied.
This restriction has been somewhat relaxed over the last few months.
Most recently in Hyesan, for example, our staff can walk now to a monument and back unaccompanied.
Our staff are not allowed to have satellite phones or vehicle-to-vehicle communications or secure international communications arrangements.
We are not allowed to have nationals of Japan or the Republic of (South) Korea on staff; and we have only one United States national in the country.
(He is the Country Director.)
Again, these are matters that we constantly raise with the Authorities.
Page 60 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
This being said, we have come a very long way with the DPRK Authorities over the past four years, as trust and confidence has been built.
Some of these milestones include: The establishment of five WFP Sub-Offices throughout the country; and 50 international staff, many of who are located in the Sub-Offices.
A remarkable advance on the three staff members, all of who were located in Pyongyang, which was the situation in 1995.
WFP is the only agency to have access to so many counties, some 163 of 206; and have staff permanently assigned outside of Pyongyang.
The number of counties to which we have access has increased from 145 in 1998 to 163 in 2002.
This means that we can now reach more people who need help--about 85% of the population.
Since 2000, WFP international staff have been able to take Korean language training lessons in Pyongyang.
A few have a pretty fair grasp of the language and can at least detect when interpretation is not accurate.
The Government has agreed to a new Nutrition Survey to follow up the 1998 Nutrition Survey.
This has been a longstanding issue on our agenda; and the Government's agreement is a big step forward.
A technical proposal for the conduct of the Survey is now with the authorities.
The Survey is scheduled for the third quarter of this year, with the results being available before the end of the year.
The Survey will be a joint UNICEF/WFP/DPRK undertaking, with technical support being provided through an international academic consortium.
The results of the Survey will enable us to compare the situation in 2002 with that of 1998; to measure the progress of the nutritional status of children; and to improve the planning and targeting of interventions for their benefit.
Page 61 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The Government has re-affirmed its commitment to give WFP a full list of the institutions though which WFP food assistance is provided.
This arrangement will enable WFP to increase the randomness of its monitoring.
It is, of course, not the same as random access.
But it is progress.
The Authorities informed us that this list is to be made available ''shortly.''
The 1998 Nutrition Survey found that about 62% of children under seven years of age were suffering chronic malnutrition; the kind that arises from eating insufficient nutritious food day in and day out over a protracted period.
That same Survey showed that about 16% of children were acutely malnourished, the kind that is generally associated with the existence of famine.
WFP does not have the luxury of saying that it will leave because our minimum operational conditions are not met.
We need to remain engaged and persevere, and work towards achieving those conditions.
They will not be met if we all simply pull out.
And the resultant suffering for the country's most vulnerable would verge towards the unimaginable.
We remain optimistic that with persistent principled negotiation--and the support of the international community--much more progress can be made.
As to resources, WFP will run out of food in July or August this year unless new pledges are made urgently.
The urgency arises because it takes from 2-4 months to translate a pledge from a donor to food into the stomach of a child in North Korea.
Beginning this month we are having to eliminate the distribution of food to some 675,000 secondary school children; and some 350,000 of the elderly will not receive any food rations through WFP. Caregivers in institutions--some 144,000 of them, mainly women--will not receive WFP rations.
And food-for Work must be sharply cut back, thereby reaching far fewer urban underemployed in the Northeast, affecting perhaps 500,000 people.
Some 1.5 million people will not get food because of the shortfall.
Page 62 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
DPRK is a mountainous country with limited arable land and a short growing season.
It cannot produce enough food to meet the basic requirements of its people.
And it does not have the foreign exchange to import that food.
For 2002, a ''normal bad year'', the gap between the quantity of food that is available (food production plus imports) and the needs of the North Korean people is about 1.5 million metric tons of cereals.
WFP does not seek to fill the national gap.
We calculate the food needs of the most vulnerable groups--pregnant women, nursing mothers, children and a small percentage of the elderly and those most dependent on the Public Distribution System.
Women and children comprise about 90% of those who receive WFP food.
For some categories of beneficiary the food is provided year-round, for example pregnant women, nursing mothers and children in primary schools.
For other categories of beneficiary such as secondary school children, the food is targeted geographically to those living in the urban areas of the most food insecure Provinces, mainly in the Northeast.
For other categories, such as Food-for Work beneficiaries, the food assistance is provided only during certain times of the year, typically over the period April through August when these people must depend on a Public Distribution System that cannot cope.
WFP needs 611,000 metric tons of food for calendar year 2002 to meet the needs of the 6.4 million beneficiaries, most of who are women and children who live in the counties to which we have access.
We have available about half of that amount.
The United States, the Republic of Korea and Finland have given to this year's operation; and we are hopeful that other donors will step forward.
As I indicated earlier, we are having to cut back on our planned distributions.
Doing this will stretch the reach of our support to pregnant women, nursing mothers and children aged from six months to 10 years for a few more months.
It will not be enough to meet their requirements for the year.
An erstwhile recipient of WFP food assistance will therefore have to rely on a Public Distribution System that will provide her with perhaps 200-250 grammes of cereal per day.
Or about half of the ration of a refugee in a camp.
There is no doubt that the people are hungry and need the food.
Without that food, the prospects are chilling.
Those who rely on WFP assistance are looking down the barrel of a food crisis.
Page 63 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Before closing, on behalf of WFP I would like to thank the people of the United States for their unstinting generosity to the most vulnerable people in North Korea--their women and children.
The United States has already contributed some 155,000 metric tones of food to the Emergency Operation for 2002.
Without this food, the situation would be much more serious; and it would have become so much earlier.
And it has been the major contributor to our Emergency Operations over the years of our work in that country.
The United States has also been a strong and clear voice in support of the kind of measures that would further improve the operational performance of our work; and in improving the working conditions of our staff.
And, perhaps most importantly, the United States has consistently shown the commitment to separate its political agenda from humanitarian concern, holding true to the principle spelled out by former president Reagan ''A hungry child knows no politics''.
This is not always an easy principle to follow; and we admire you being able to do so.
We thank you.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you, Mr. Powell.
Mr. Peters? STATEMENT OF TIMOTHY A. PETERS, FOUNDER AND DIRECTOR, HELPING HANDS/KOREA AND TON-A-MONTH CLUB Mr. PETERS.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for this privilege and honor to appear before the Subcommittee today.
I am a spokesman and founder for two small, what I call grassroots initiatives.
One, Helping Hands Korea, which is principally to aid North Korean refugees and was founded approximately 4 years ago.
And, in fact, this was an outgrowth of our first initiative, which was Ton-a-Month Club, a tiny, as the name implies, a small initiative started in 1996 as more news reports surfaced about the famine in North Korea.
Page 64 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I hope that in some ways that my testimony might represent the efforts of small, individual citizens who are concerned and do not have large resources, but nevertheless feel that action is imperative, even on an individual basis.
I'm happy to say that despite the IMF crisis in Korea that began in December 1997, a recent checking of our records revealed that, quite amazingly, despite the fact that we are not a registered charity in South Korea, we were 10 years ahead of schedule of our Ton-a-Month Club--one ton per month donation.
So it's a testimony, I believe, to the fact that it is possible for individuals to make a difference.
Naturally, using our own resources and small fundraisers, we wanted to be sure that our efforts and our donations were going where they were intended that the ''widows' mites'' that we were collecting, in fact, were going where they were intended.
Factfinding missions to Northeast China showed us after perhaps 2 or 3 years, that there were troubling developments about transparency.
At the same time we came to learn of the refugee crisis during these factfinding missions.
That was when Helping Hands Korea was born and we began to shift, although limited, a larger percentage of our collected donations to helping refugees.
In my opinion, and in my experience, this has a very distinct advantage in that you are continuing to help the North Koreans.
However, you have eliminated the middle man.
You have eliminated handing over the donation to the bureaucracy that is controlling the North Koreans within their own borders.
Instead, you are entrusting your donations to tried and proven, very sacrificial aid workers in third countries--China, but other countries as well.
Page 65 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
As to the effects of the long-term famine, as Mr. Becker referred to, I wonder if, for a moment, we could put a face on this.
If I could ask that one picture of a young boy be put on the monitor.
The name of this boy is Yoo Chul Min.
In fact, I first came in contact with this 10-year old boy last April in a combined aid trip to Northeast China.
As well, I invited Dr. Vollertsen to join us, since he had been sent out of North Korea itself; I encouraged Dr. Vollertsen to come and help the refugees in Northeast China.
He very kindly came.
As well we also brought some international journalists with us to see the refugee situation.
During that visit, I had the pleasure of meeting this small North Korean boy who was taking refuge in a missionary's home.
He, as you can see, this was actually the picture to be given to the South Korean Embassy in Ulan Bator when Mr. Yoo Chul Min would have crossed the border from China into Mongolia and then taken--escorted by activists to the capital of Mongolia for processing for a final--being brought to South Korea.
I'm using Chul Min because, despite the fact that 1 or 2 years of relatively good diet in China and his appearance to be a relatively healthy, pre-teen boy, the events that I will describe shows how mistaken these appearances are and the ravages of the long-term famine.
Chul Min was one of five members of a team that were gathered to make an attempt to cross under the nine high voltage fences that exist at the China-Mongolian frontier.
Unfortunately, the leader who had been briefed--the leader of their small team who had been briefed the night before, several hours prior to the departure time, the leader was picked up by Chinese security officials and the remaining small team was leaderless.
Page 66 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Given the crackdown as of roughly February of last year in Northeast China against the North Korean refugees, the team made a very sobering decision that they would go forward feeling that they could not go back to the area of Yenji and other Chinese towns near the Chinese-North Korean border with which they had some familiarity.
They went forward and perhaps, predictably, became lost.
They were 26 hours without food and water.
This does not seem life-threatening, even to a normal and healthy pre-teen boy.
I'm very sad to say that this cannot be said for Chul Min.
He perished in the frontier within those 26 hours, which I believe reveals simply that his young body, which had been ravaged by the long-term effects of malnutrition in his home town or his own particular situation in North Korea had weakened him to this point.
Because my time is quickly running out, I am going to ask that another picture be shown, if it is all right.
This is my dear friend Chun Ki Won, and perhaps, one of the bravest men I have ever had the privilege of knowing.
He is a Robin Hood in every sense of the word of helping the poor and helpless.
In fact, this gentleman is now languishing in an Inner-Mongolian prison because he has helped in the underground railroad of assisting North Korean refugees to Mongolia and other areas.
He was caught on December 30th of 2001 attempting to take over a number of refugees after many successful attempts before.
Unfortunately, this time it's very possible that among the handful of refugees was a possible informer who had informed the Chinese security in advance that they were coming and he was picked up.
He remains in prison in Inner-Mongolia.
He has been there for a few days beyond 4 months.
He has been visited only once by a consular officer of his nationality in South Korea as far as we know, as of a week ago.
Page 67 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
And I can only act as a spokesman, a voice for, not only Mr. Chun, but many others whom I consider unsung heroes who have taken it upon themselves, not only their personal safety, but their personal resources.
Some of whom have gone into debt for considerable amounts, which have strained their marriages and their own personal finances to bring North Koreans to safety.
I would like to suggest, therefore, that due consideration be given to allocating funds to help those who are literally risking their lives to help North Korean refugees in third countries.
I would also like to suggest on the humanitarian aid side the possibility of a shotgun effect.
Instead of giving enormous amounts at one given time, and in state-to-state transfers, I would like to strongly suggest that smaller allocations of grants, et cetera, could be given so that the likelihood that more of the aid could get across the border in accepted channels.
In channels that--I'm sorry, not DPRK accepted channels, but channels that have been already established as tried and proven through a strong relationship that has been formed with the ethnic Chinese-Korean community on the border and taken across.
I feel that due consideration should be given to portioning out smaller amounts of large grants, and giving that to aid organizations that, perhaps, could have an improved level of effectiveness.
I thank you very much.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Peters follows:] Page 68 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
PREPARED STATEMENT OF TIMOTHY A. PETERS, FOUNDER AND DIRECTOR, HELPING HANDS/KOREA AND TON-A-MONTH CLUB Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for your invitation to testify and this opportunity to address the House Committee on International Relations, Subcommittee on East Asia and the Pacific, on humanitarian and human rights concerns related to North Koreans.
In this written statement I will briefly address the humanitarian aid aspect of our work, then give special emphasis to our efforts to ease the plight of North Korean refugees in China.
BACKGROUND OF OUR RELIEF EFFORTS Helping Hands Korea is a Christian charitable initiative based in Seoul that was founded in 1990.
In October of 1996, our organization significantly shifted its primary focus from activities within South Korea to the desperate needs of North Koreans.
Our first project to help needy North Koreans was a grassroots initiative we named Ton-a-Month Club.
Its genesis was a small prayer meeting around our kitchen table in the summer of 1996 and took as its goal providing humanitarian food aid to the most vulnerable victims of famine in the North.
With a staff limited to my own family and a handful of volunteers with limited resources, our project has not gained official charitable status with the Republic of Korea government, so our fundraising has relied principally on rallying sacrificial donations from concerned South Koreans, expatriate residents in South Korea and several longstanding and faithful supporters in the U.S. to purchase one ton per month (or its equivalent value) of desperately needed foodstuffs to send as famine-relief to the North Korean civilian population.
In the six years since its inception, Ton-a-Month Club has dispatched food aid to North Koreans through a number of channels: Korean National Red Cross, The Internet Campaign to Help North Korean Flood Victims, Good Friends, as well as a wide range of independent deliveries that have been arranged with the assistance of aid workers on the border of China and North Korea to bring rice, corn, wheat flour, and a mixture of goat and soy milk to individual villages and towns in the neediest areas of Hamkyoungpuk-to Province of North Korea.
Page 69 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Like many other humanitarian aid initiatives large and small, we at Helping Hands Korea continue to have serious concerns regarding North Korean government interference in the delivery of food aid to the most vulnerable sectors of its population: children under age six, orphaned children, pregnant mothers, the handicapped and the elderly.
It is our understanding that North Korean society is divided into 52 strata, and the basis for these divisions is essentially the degree of loyalty to the Kim Jong-il regime.
Humanitarian aid given in government-to-government transfers to North Korea becomes a reward to the loyal and its deprivation constitutes a punishment for the disloyal.
It is apparent to us that the priorities of the North Korean government in awarding food aid to its citizens is fundamentally at cross purposes with our own desire to see the neediest taken care of.
For that reason, we have periodically conducted in the past four years combined fact-finding trips to Northeastern China (as well as an actual monitoring trip to the Rajin-Songbong area of North Korea itself) to regularly seek out more effective and transparent methods to ensure that our donors' wishes to feed the most vulnerable were being honored.
REFUGEE ASSISTANCE: AN OUTGROWTH OF FAMINE RELIEF In the course of the abovementioned fact-finding trips to northeastern China in a quest to continually improve our Ton-a-Month effectiveness, we grew increasingly aware and deeply concerned by the discovery of a considerable number of North Koreans who had fled their nation due to hunger, privation, and fear of political and religious persecution.
In China we began to visit secret orphanages for North Korean children and temporary urban shelters for adults.
On two occasions we have also invited a physician to join us for the purpose of bringing medical attention to North Koreans in a mountain hideaway as well as urban shelters in northeastern China.
Page 70 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The more we personally investigated and interviewed individuals in this large-scale exodus, the more shocked we became at a growing body of reliable reports that the number of North Korean refugees had swollen to a quarter million or more in China, not to mention those who had fled to other surrounding countries such as Russia, Vietnam, Cambodia, and Thailand.
Accordingly, we at Helping Hands Korea decided that, in addition to helping malnourished North Koreans in their hometowns, we would actively address the needs of North Korean refugees in China by devoting a significant proportion of collected donations to this second crisis.
To make it easier for donors to distinguish between the two projects in designating their donations, we have maintained the name Ton-a-Month Club to denote famine relief within North Korea and now use Helping Hands Korea to specify refugee assistance.
Donors are invited to clarify how they would like their donations used.
TWO CRITICAL ADVANTAGES IN HELPING NORTH KOREAN REFUGEES The more we analyzed this second initiative, the clearer it became that support for refugee ''safehouses'' and ''secret orphanages'' for North Korean children in China, carried with it a double advantage.
On one hand, the quality of monitoring our donors' aid, a chronic difficulty in direct or indirect dealing with North Korean bureaucrats, was immediately enhanced through our newfound direct access to refugees.
By assisting refugees, we were personally able to deliver donations to like-minded humanitarian workers and receive feedback from the refugees themselves.
Hence, we received the implicit and enormous strategic advantage of eliminating from our aid delivery chain the ''middleman'' of the North Korean bureaucracy and its well-documented and dubious agenda in food distribution.
[See reports on this issue from Medecins Sans Frontieres (Doctors Without Borders), Oxfam, etc.]
A second advantage, in our view, when helping refugees is the ability we have of directly rewarding those individuals who exhibit personal bravery and the sovereignty of free choice by leaving destitution and oppression so rampant in their own country and forging into the unknown in the quest of a better life, despite the inherent dangers of an unprotected existence in China or Russia.
Page 71 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Although refugee children naturally rank first in our list of priorities for assistance, it must be emphasized that tragedy can be witnessed at virtually every age group of North Koreans hiding in China.
For example, we have brought medical assistance to a refugee who had fallen victim to a loan shark in northeastern China.
An aid worker had attempted to place the threatened man in safety, but was short of resources at the time of the first visit.
When I accompanied the aid worker to China on the following visit, the loan shark had already extracted his ''pound of flesh'' from the refugee, by hiring someone to stab the male refugee in the face and putting out one eye.
The aid worker was almost beside himself with grief, feeling responsible for the loss of the refugee's eye.
The extreme urgency of the dual crisis of long-term famine within North Korea and the North Korean refugee crisis in China and other surrounding countries, including Russia, can be encapsulated in the story I recently wrote of 10 year-old North Korean boy, Yoo Chul Min, whom I met in April and June of 2001 in China.
WHO WAS YOO CHUL MIN? AND WHY DOES IT MATTER? A 10 year-old North Korean refugee boy hiding in China, made a sobering decision that was light years away from what most other elementary 4th graders are preoccupied with--a life-and-death gamble to cross the China-Mongolian border under the cover of darkness.
His name was Yoo Chul Min and his decision resulted in a heart-rending tragedy.
Joining five other North Koreans, also desperate for even a fleeting glimpse of freedom, Chul Min and his companions became disoriented for 26 hours in the arid, desert-like conditions of the Mongolian frontier.
Years of gradual malnutrition in North Korea had weakened Yoo Chul Min's body and the normal reserve of endurance and resistance to the elements one would expect of a healthy preteen boy were sadly lacking.
Yoo Chul Min died from exhaustion and exposure on July 7th, 2001.
His body was carried across the Mongolian border by the remaining refugee team when they finally gained their bearings.
Page 72 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Perhaps I've taken a particular interest in this story because it so happened that Chul Min and my paths crossed in the course of my work in Helping Hands Korea.
I had met and just begun getting to know this 10 year-old on two occasions, shortly before his death, this year.
At the time, he was under the protection of courageous Korean missionaries in the Yenbian (ethnic Chinese-Korean region) district of northeast China.
I remember noticing how withdrawn this boy was.
Because he had lived in China for over a year, he did not immediately strike me as malnourished and his clothes were clean.
I noticed with some amusement that he would never take off his baseball cap, even inside the house of my friend.
My curiosity grew into a little personal challenge to spend some time with him and see if I could find a way to break through that shell of suspicion of foreigners and get a friendship started.
I was told by those caring for him that Chul Min was very studious and doing well in a Chinese elementary school.
One day in June of this year, I happened to spot on the missionary's bookshelf the Korean version of a book that I had read countless times with my own five children, in English, as they were growing up, The Picture Bible.
Despite his initial reluctance to sit down next to a dreaded American, Chul Min's curiosity about the book seemed to get the upper hand, and soon we were leafing through the wonderfully illustrated volume together and he was eagerly reading the Korean text aloud.
It became the bridge for what I hoped would be a real friendship.
Little did I realize at that time, that death was only a month away for my little newfound friend.
In the days that followed the jarring news of Chul Min's sudden death, despite our urgent entreaties, the security officials in Mongolia did not agree to wait for Chul Min's father to arrive in Ulan Bator to identify his son's body and to be present at his burial.
Mr. Yoo, Chul Min's father, himself was a recent arrival to South Korea as a North Korean refugee from China, and an extra amount of time was needed for him to obtain South Korean travel documents.
(The adjoining photo shows Chul Min's father, a new Christian, mourning his son's death shortly after seeing his son's grave for the first time on the barren Mongolian desert near the China/Mongolian border) Page 73 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
THE DANGERS FACED BY REFUGEE AID WORKERS IN CHINA Tragedy befalls aid workers in China also with unnerving frequency in the course of their humanitarian labors.
One courageous aid worker in China personally takes care of six separate refugee shelters in China.
Approached from behind in the dark over one year ago, he was stabbed in the stomach by an unseen assailant.
The likeliest suspect of this hideous crime is one of thousands of undercover North Korean agents who operate in China to track down, capture and forcefully repatriate refugees back to North Korea against their will.
Due to complicated security circumstances and a very narrow timeframe, it was necessary to bring a physician to a quiet corner of a transportation terminal restaurant to administer necessary antibiotics to the aid worker as this maneuver was shielded from the view of authorities by other members of the aid community at the table.
Many Christian and other humanitarian activists are fully aware that they face arrest and imprisonment as a result of providing food, shelter and guidance to safety to the North Korean refugees.
One such heroic activist is South Korean evangelist Chun Ki Won.
On the night of December 30th, 2001 Evangelist Chun was arrested near the tiny border town of Dungqi (150 km southwest of Hilar) in the northeastern area of Inner Mongolia, PRC, while attempting to help twelve North Korean refugees cross the border from China to Mongolia.
To the best of our knowledge, two of the 12 North Korean refugees have been repatriated to North Korea in violation of the 1951 International Convention on Refugees of which the People's Republic of China is a signatory.
Ten still remain incarcerated at a military facility near Manzhouli, Inner Mongolia.
I had the privilege of making four separate mission trips with Evangelist Chun to Northeast China as well as the China/North Korean border area in the year 2001 (January, April, June and December).
During these four journeys, I had many opportunities to observe Mr. Chun's personal courage and sacrificial spirit as exhibited in lending vital assistance to North Korean refugees who were being hunted down by both Chinese security officials and North Korean secret police operating clandestinely within China.
We opened and outfitted refugee shelters together, helped to transfer refugees to new locations within China, and provided briefings to refugees who insisted on making the hazardous bid to freedom by crossing the Chinese border with Mongolia.
In certain cases, the North Korean refugees were in such a state of desperation due to North Korean secret police being in hot pursuit of their whereabouts that they declared their willingness to try to cross the ''no man's land'' between China and Mongolia with or without assistance from activists.
Page 74 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
During many months of imprisonment with only the bare minimum of diplomatic attention from his embassy in Beijing, Evangelist Chun has been subjected to degrading treatment including cleaning prison toilets and carrying human excrement to a waste area on the prison grounds.
It is likely that he will be charged with the crimes of either smuggling or human trafficking, whereas in reality he has been carrying out the Biblical injunction: ''Hereby perceive we the love of God, because He laid down our lives for us and we ought to lay down our lives for the brethren.''
(I John 3:16) In fact, he has been giving aid and encouragement to true refugees, although China fails to recognize their status.
I respectfully and strongly request that the Committee on International Relations exert its considerable influence on the government of the People's Republic of China to petition the release of Evangelist Chun Ki Won from prison.
In closing, I wish to make the point that the heartbreaking realities of Yoo Chul Min's death and Mr. Chun's humiliating imprisonment for helping North Korean refugees are all the more tragic because they were by no means inevitable.
Had the relevant nation-signatories of the UN Charter for Refugees of 1951 in the northeastern Asian region acted upon principle and carried out their commitments to relevant charters, neither of these grievous events need have occurred.
My appearance before your Committee is largely as a representative voice for many of my colleagues in the activist community who daily lay down their lives in sacrificial service for North Korean refugees.
Due to security concerns and in some cases imprisonment, these unsung heroes are unable to appear before you.
But I submit to you that this small 'ragtag' group of volunteers has undertaken an enormous humanitarian challenge single-handedly that international organizations such as the UNHCR, with all their influence and expertise, should be addressing.
However, in actual practice, the UNHCR office in China and many governments in the region have retreated from the actual fray to occupying passive seats in the grandstands as this human drama plays out, essentially taken hostage by political and economic compromises with the major violators of international treaties that should protect the rights of North Korean refugees.
By doing so, they have abdicated an active role on the playing field upon which hundreds of thousands of lives are at stake.
Page 75 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I am confident, however, that this august body, the House of Representatives, rich in tradition of heeding the cries of the oppressed, will not follow suit.
I believe it will issue forth with the clear sound of a trumpet, speaking in an uncompromising voice in defense of the starving, intimidated populace of North Korea and the hundreds of thousands of refugees the North's failed economy and style of governance have spawned.
On behalf of the North Korean refugees and the activist community that serves them, I thank you.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you very much, Mr. Peters.
And I want to thank the panel.
Let me just begin with a couple of questions here.
There is an ongoing debate on whether public diplomacy, very high pitched, would be helpful or harmful to the refugee situation.
And then a second debate that underscores it that is even more important, whether the world community should be encouraging programs that would create far greater numbers of refugees or whether its better off to try assist the North Korea population at home.
Do you have any views on this particular subject? Mr. Becker? Mr. BECKER.
Yes, I do.
I think that there hasn't been enough public attention given to the plight of the refugees and to their testimony.
It's very hard to get this issue on television to get it to reaching a major, international audience because of the way that China controls access to the border areas and to the refugees because they're constantly in hiding and the people who help them are afraid.
And therefore, you have very, very difficult conditions in reporting what they have to say.
Page 76 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I think the more attention that is given to this, the easier it would become.
Mr. LEACH.
Does anyone else wish to comment on this? Ms. DELAUNAY.
From the field workers' point of view, we have sort of a real dilemma between the willingness to testify about what's going on and the fear that operations would be stopped.
It is also difficult for the refugees themselves who would like to say to the world what's going on in that country, and what kind of suffering they are enduring.
But at the same time, they know that it would be their relatives and their friends in danger.
So it's a constant dilemma in testifying on this issue.
Mr. LEACH.
Mr. Powell? Mr. POWELL.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
The point, I guess, that the World Food Program would like to make is that we have a massive number of people within the borders of DPRK who simply don't get enough to eat each day every day of the year.
I think that the situation of those who leave the country and cross the border into China is alarming and needs all the attention that this Committee and other Committees that might address it.
Far more profound to us is what happens to those who stay? We have 6.4 million of them today who are WFP beneficiaries.
The numbers are clearly greater than those that we provide assistance to.
So in looking at the needs of the 153,000, please do not let us forget the 6.5 million, 90 percent of whom are women and children who will not get across the border.
Page 77 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. LEACH.
Well, the international community has yet to come to grips with the second sanctuary issue.
I mean, we understand the dilemma of China.
They may get more than they would like, but where would they go after China? And it's impressive to me how few have gone to South Korea to date, not how many.
And the rest of the world community isn't offering second sanctuary either.
Do you think that is a subject that ought to be raised as a matter of international diplomacy? Mr. Peters? Mr. PETERS.
I'm sorry, Mr. Chairman, I'm not sure I fully understood.
Are you saying that the number of refugees are relatively limited that have come into South Korea, so where could the rest go? Mr. LEACH.
Well, should not more go to South Korea or are there other alternatives? Mr. PETERS.
Certainly, in my opinion, many more could go to South Korea.
At the moment, the facility that is preparing North Korean defectors for life in South Korea is being expanded.
I believe in the coming month they will be able to handle 300 at a time, and that would only translate into 1200 per year.
Frankly, I think it's too little.
It's too late.
It would certainly need to be improved, and the flood of refugees seems to be building.
But it would strike me also as a distinct possibility that other nations could begin considering absorbing the overflow of refugees.
Frankly speaking, I'm not at all convinced that taking North Koreans who basically have lived in a failed economy for decades and tossing most of them into the high speed dynamic, almost overwhelming environment of Seoul or other large South Korean cities--it's difficult for me to accept that as an acceptable solution for many of them.
Page 78 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
It would seem like a ''decompression area'' would be preferable.
Perhaps, farms in central Asia.
If certain central Asian nations would possibly consider taking some refugees, and in some cases, we have indications that Mongolia is not against North Koreans living and staying there on a temporary basis as long as they do not become a burden upon their own social safety net, which is extremely fragile as it is.
But it would seem to me that with sufficient support from the outside, that in many cases North Korean farmers, for example, could be introduced gradually to a market economy instead of suddenly being fast-forwarded 3 or 4 decades economically into a very fast paced South Korean society in which many times--all too many times--they fail and other social problems result.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you.
Mr. Becker and then I'll conclude.
Mr. BECKER.
I know that the UNHCR in Beijing has often tried to negotiate some kind of deal with the Chinese government which would allow them to set up some kind of centers where they could assist the refugees, you know, if they were needing food or aid, give them temporary shelter, give them basic requirements and then, encourage them to go back, or if they wanted to claim political asylum, to do so and go through the customary procedures.
This has constantly been refused by the Chinese government.
They've turned this option down.
I know many NGOs have also approached the Chinese government, offering to do something of this nature.
I think if there was a bit more pressure on the Chinese government, they might agree to this.
And secondly, I think the people--the North Koreans who have come over--are very much feared by the North Korean government when they return because when they come back they tell everyone that they've seen something of the outside world and it's quite different from the picture painted by North Korean propaganda.
That's a huge shock and that could potentially make a huge impact on North Korean society and sort of push forward some change.
Thank you.
Page 79 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you, sir.
Mr. Faleomavaega? Mr. FALEOMAVAEGA.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I certainly appreciate the testimonies that have been provided.
I don't know whether I feel more depressed or encouraged in terms of trying to provide a solution to the problem that I don't think any government or even the world community has the capability of resolving simply because we're talking about a totalitarian and a complete dictatorship.
And I get the very strong impression, after listening to Mr. Becker and Ms. Delaunay kind of the barriers went down.
We're not doing enough.
And then, after hearing Mr. Powell saying, well, we're doing a lot of things.
But I get the strong impression, after listening to the witnesses this morning, that it comes to the bottom line that the North Korean government actually controls when, where, and how the food the aid system is providing is distributed.
I get the strong impression, also, that in a very cold, calculated way, the dictatorship or the regime makes sure that the Army is properly fed, but as far as women and children, they're expendable.
And with a country of 23 million people, it just makes it more complex to me in trying to figure out how we're going to feed a starving population when you know that the government that controls the system controls us.
So Mr. Powell commented earlier that we are making strides, but to what extent are we really serious about this? Mr. Becker suggested that our food aid program is somewhat of a failed policy.
At the same time, if we don't provide some kind of food aid, you're going to have people starving to death.
Page 80 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I'm asking for solutions and I wanted to ask you, Mr. Powell, you've been there personally.
Do you think that we are making strides in providing this kind of aid given the fact that we're dealing with a governmental system that is totally repressive? Are they really serious about wanting the world community to give them assistance or it is because they have a policy or a system of priorities that is quite different from the rest of the world community? I'd like to ask Mr. Powell what his impressions are because it seems to me that the leadership of the North Korean government really has no basis of really considering whether or not women and children starve to death.
It's irrelevant.
And to what extent has the food aid been given to make sure that the Army is fully fed? I'd like to ask Mr. Powell is a portion of the food aid given really going to provide for the needs of the Army more so than the general population? Mr. POWELL.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
If I can deal with the last part of the question first.
The answer is yes.
What the North Korean military does, and the power does, is the take first cut at the national harvest.
And they take what they want in the amount they want it at the time they want it.
I think that is common ground between the North Korean and ourselves and almost anyone else that deals with that issue seriously.
There are at least two donors who provide food bilaterally.
That is, they give it to the government of DPRK and say, please, do good things with this food.
One of those countries is in China.
The other one is the Republic of Korea.
I would guess, that through you, Mr. Chairman, those countries would not only want to see the bulk of the population DPRK feed.
I should imagine that would not want to have a hungry Army on their borders.
So I can understand why some people might want to give undirected food assistance.
Page 81 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
For our part, what we are concerned about is to provide food to the most vulnerable in that country.
The most vulnerable in that country are pregnant women, nursing mothers and small children up to the age of 16--secondary school kids.
The other extraordinarily vulnerable group are the elderly.
Dealing first with those who are most young, what we do is there is a map that is provided in our package which shows where we have set up, 1816, what we call ''local production facilities.''
What these facilities seek to do is to produce food particularly designed to meet the food, nutrition, and micronutrient needs of women and small children, children in pediatric hospitals.
So the food tracks from the port of arrival at a distribution plan decided by the World Food Program in collaboration with DPRK, but it is decided by us.
We have a port captain who ensures that the quantity of foods that arrives is the quantity of food that is delivered.
When that food is not in 50 kg bags as we ask, that food is bagged at the port before it leaves the port.
All of those bags have the markings of the donor.
That food is then taken to the sites which are marked as these ''local food production facilities.''
It is there, combined with other food inputs, micronutrient inputs provided by UNICEF where it is converted into rice soy milk for CSM and so on.
That is provided then, from the institution from that production plant, to the various institutions, whether they be hospitals, pediatric hospitals; whether they be orphanages; whether they be the institutions which children of ages between 6 months and 4 years are placed from date of birth--from that age.
Page 82 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
What we are, therefore, able to do is to track the food through that system to where it is consumed by the beneficiaries at that site.
When I talk about monitoring and the number of monitoring visit is, I'm talking about that whole chain.
The chain which starts from saying which port should this food be delivered to, to how much goes to which food production plant to how much biscuit for CSM is produced to which institution it is delivered and in what quantities.
That is what our monitors look at.
We know what the numbers are.
I agree with you, however, implicitly, that it's not impossible to fiddle the numbers.
That's why it's so important to be able to look at the children.
Look at them.
Do they have the visible characteristics of those who are acutely malnourished or do they not.
When you see where the place they ate and the time they ate.
When they come into a room, does it look as if it's the first time in the room.
Do they know where to sit? Does it look as if it's the first time they've had this kind of food? All the practical things that you and I would do where we to want to know is this the first time this child has done this.
What we find is the answer is no.
It is a consistent pattern, and that we find the visible observation; namely, that there is a sharp decline in acute malnutrition and the children seem used to eating this food at this time.
And when we track back the numbers, they match.
The bottom line, through you, Mr. Chairman, through that arrangements for those kinds of food stuffs, we don't go near the public distribution system--direct distribution, through the chain.
Page 83 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. FALEOMAVAEGA.
My time, I know, is nearly up, Mr. Chairman, but I just want to say that the predicament that I and Members of the Committee find ourselves in, is that we feel so helpless.
We feel like we know what the problems are.
The international community doesn't seem to be outraged.
I don't hear the United Nations coming out and putting pressure on the North Korean Army to do something about this serious problem.
And as Mr. Becker suggested earlier, we have a failed policy of the food aid, but what do you suggest, Mr. Becker? How do you suggest resolving the issue? And I'll end with that, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. BECKER.
I don't have a pat solution either.
I think of the problems is there isn't enough media attention to it because you can't get pictures of what really goes on in North Korea, and you can't get reliable witnesses--witnesses that are acceptable to everyone.
I think the international community has looked to South Korea's Sunshine Policy to find a way out of this impasse, and unfortunately, it now seems to have run it course without being successful.
Therefore, I think another possible initiative would be for the United States to organize more of an internationally coordinated policy on North Korea, which would bring together the food issues, the security issues, and the economic issues together in order to sort of bring this to some sort of resolution.
I mean, it's impossible--not impossible, but it's extraordinary that a famine aid program should have gone on for so long and without apparently an end in sight, and having reached that stage and having failed with the Sunshine Policy, I mean, it must be time for a fresh initiative which would bring more of the actors together to agree on a plan of action.
Page 84 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. LEACH.
Mr. Royce? Mr. ROYCE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
The panel mentioned basically that the Army gets the food and the people starve.
Is this a situation of indifference to the people by the ruling elite or is there, perhaps, a consensus policy to keep people hungry? Does the regime want the North Korean people, or at least many of them weak, and that's the question I pose to the panel.
I pose that because there seems to be a policy of starvation.
And this would not be the first time in history where there is a state policy to keep the serfs weak.
Certainly in Sparta, Lycurgus, developed a system where the spartans were kept healthy and strong.
And the concept was to keep the serfs as weak as possible, and periodically, when they became too numerous to actually eliminate a large percentage of the serf population in Sparta.
My father took photographs at Dachau, at the liberation of that camp.
Again, there was a state policy to take those who did not support the Reich--to take those who were the Jews or the social democratic, the monarchist and the leftist, and if they didn't support the Reich, to literally put them in camps and work them to death and to starve them to death.
So there are only some 43 counties that you do not have access to in the country out of some 203; and those are the areas where we hear about these work camps.
These concentration camps where people are being worked and starved to death.
My question is, is that state policy in North Korea? I'd ask any of the members of the panel who might want to respond to answer.
Page 85 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. PETERS.
Congressman Royce, I don't pretend to be an expert on the ongoings on inside North Korea, but I think it is--I believe Mr. Becker referred to the fact that North Korean society is stratified, basically, according loyalty to the regime.
In effect, there is even up to, I understand, 52 distinct levels within society.
But the primary litmus test as how high up the scale you go, of course, is your loyalty to the Kim Jong-Il regime.
It seems that it's absolutely correct that food is used as a reward or as a weapon regarding loyalty.
I, frankly, believe that and see evidence of it in testimonies from defectors that I think it's without question.
Thank you.
Mr. ROYCE.
Let's talk about the 43 areas, Mr. Powell, where you cannot go.
What's your anecdotal information about what goes on there.
I've read a book about what purports to go on there.
It's hard for me to believe that, that type of horror could exist at this time.
That there could be that level of abrogation of rights and starvation.
But what do you hear is going on in that sector? Mr. POWELL.
Thank you very much, Chairman.
I do apologize on this particular element.
I am not able to enlighten the Committee simply because we do not know.
We are absolutely refused access.
We cannot pass through those areas in transit to somewhere else.
So we simply don't go there at all.
If I might just spend a moment on your previous question.
There are two parts to it.
The first is that the country simply doesn't produce enough food to feed itself.
It doesn't have the foreign exchange to buy what is needed and it doesn't have the creditworthiness to borrow on terms to get it.
So all we're talking about each year is whether the deficit in food terms is 1.2 to 3 million tons of cereals or it's 2.2 million tons of food.
So it's massive deficit.
Page 86 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
So I don't think there should be, in a sense, a misunderstanding of a policy of starvation.
It is simply they do not produce enough to feed themselves and they cannot find a way to buy it.
Mr. ROYCE.
Well, let me ask you this.
I mean, money is fungible.
For those of us that have spent some time in Korea and seen an Army that's at over a million strong and one of the largest in manpower.
One of the largest armies in the world.
It is certainly odd to see a military build up that is far in excess of anything they could possibly use while people are starving to death.
And so it does beg the question, since those resources could go to keep the rural population alive, why would you put 80 percent of the national budget, in terms of military buildup? I guess that's a rhetorical question.
Sophie, would you have any observations? Ms. DELAUNAY.
I'd be happy to add a few comments to these discussions.
I think we all agree that there is a food shortage in North Korea.
The point is not to even try to estimate them because at the moment it's not transparent enough to do so.
But I think that it's time to question why we have not been able to solve the problem.
And where all this food has gone.
We have some information that it goes to the Army and that the Army is well-fed.
But we also have information that there is food on the black market.
That is not just the South Korean rice or the Chinese rice.
There is also what they call the U.N. drugs.
The North Koreans, they know how to recognize maize coming from China or from the Western world or from their own country.
They know all this, and they are able to give you the price of each item.
Page 87 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
And when you meet them regularly, you realize that there is a real economy.
And that they are all commodities available in the black market at the moment in North Korea.
And that the prices are fluctuating and the fluctuating of prices are quite similar with the amount of humanitarian assistance which arrives in the country.
And it's normal because the only availability comes from the aid.
So I think there are some resources now in North Korea.
And according to the refugees, you can find everything you need.
The problem they have at the moment is that they have no money to buy it.
Mr. ROYCE.
So you're saying, what you testified to, was that as you interview these refugees they have not received food through these programs.
Many of them have never had a meal, and yet, at the same time you find that on the black market.
That food is available, presumably, it's either through corruption or the government has a policy of earning the exchange--their hard currency by taking that money, and instead of feeding the people with it, the North Korean government is basically selling it.
Ms. DELAUNAY.
I don't know exactly what are the mechanism.
What I've heard was that there are some commodities, a lot of commodities, more than before--they say that's much more than before '95.
And that if they had the money, the would be able to have a decent life there.
Mr. ROYCE.
Thank you very much.
Mr. Chairman, thank you.
Mr. LEACH.
Mr. Rohrabacher? Page 88 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. ROHRABACHER.
Thank you very much.
First, I'd like to ask Mr. Becker about, and this may be off the set of focus of the hearing, but could you tell us why you were fired from your job as at the newspaper.
Mr. BECKER.
Well, I went to see the editor about 3 weeks ago to express my concerns about the way the coverage of China and, indeed, the North Korean issue was being changed.
And that there had been an effort by the Hong Kong authority after October to sort of bring the South China Morning Post under control.
And they'd begun sort of issuing demands that all the foreign journalists should be replaced by ethnic Chinese journalists.
And there was sort of a compromise negotiated.
And from that moment on, I began to notice that they were changing the way we were reporting on China.
We couldn't get access to funds to fund our bureau.
We've been restricted on the trips we go.
The stories were being changed.
And for instance, stories on North Korea were being changed so that stuff was being added to my copy saying that the North Korean famine was due to harsh winters and so on.
Mr. ROHRABACHER.
So you're seeing here an example of creeping totalitarianism and the control that the very evil that we're talking about in North Korea is just actually creeping along and even expanding even outside of Korea Mr. BECKER.
Yes, I thought that the Chinese authorities in Hong Kong were trying to bring the very lively Hong Kong media under control.
I wanted to express my concerns privately and to sort of try to change things by arguing this wasn't really necessary--this self-censorship.
But my criticisms were not acceptable.
So I was fired.
Page 89 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. ROHRABACHER.
Being a former journalist myself, I totally sympathize with what you're saying and for those who think they're going to feed the crocodile with self-censorship, let us note that they will be eaten by the crocodile in very short order.
And that self-censorship and the type of bending over backwards and trying to placate these terrorist regimes, gangster regimes, will always lead to a North Korea situation in the end where you have a--well, however we would like to characterize the mental state of their leader and the leaders of the regime.
But we do know they are willing to see large numbers of their own people starve to death while they pump money into their military establishment; perhaps, out of some physiological paranoia.
What a tragedy that is.
And this is not something that has just happened in Korea.
As my friend, Mr. Royce, has indicated.
Historically, we can see these things have happened in the past.
I'm sorry that you, personally, have had to face this; but I think that the world needs to know that when a journalist is censored, it's just a another step into the abyss and into the blackness and darkness of totalitarianism and toward the direction of this type of depravation of freedom and just even the basics of life for normal people.
In terms of what's been going on in Korea, I understand that there is about 350,000 tons of wheat are shipped per year from the United States to North Korea, is that right? Mr. BECKER.
Yes.
Mr. ROHRABACHER.
We also provide, and others provide hundreds of millions of dollars of fuel oil to North Korea? Page 90 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. POWELL.
In technical terms, Mr. Chairman, the international community pays a subsidy on the amount of fuel--the cost of transporting the food from port to the county warehouses.
That works about 25 percent of actual costs.
It's actually $8.
Mr. ROHRABACHER.
First of all, I respect each and every one of you for your good hearts and your humanitarian instincts.
And who wants to see a little boy die like that.
I mean, obviously, I want to commend you for using that as an example to us of just how dramatic this is.
Even though, it's like the firing of a newspaper editor.
It sort of creeps up on you and sometimes it's hard to identify how evil a situation really is until you put it in the life of a boy who didn't need to die and was actually murdered by the system when you get down to it.
I don't think the United States of America should be involved in subsidizing a regime like this.
But at the same time, we have total sympathy for the people of that country.
I would hope that our desire for stability in the short run and helping those people in the short run does not prevent a change in the regime in the long run.
And I would just like your thoughts on that.
Are we, by using our hearts, preventing the total break down of the regime, which in the long run would be what would be best for everyone? Whoever wants to comment is fine with me.
Mr. PETERS.
I personally feel that the very beginning of our little Ton-of-Month effort, and in fact, it began with a small prayer around our kitchen table.
And the scripture that we received was simply ''If thy enemy hungers, feed him.''
But after 6 years of doing this, I feel that we should do it as intelligently, judiciously, wisely and in the most informed way possible.
And I'm not convinced that enormous state-to-state transfers is that way, frankly.
Page 91 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. ROHRABACHER.
Go ahead.
Mr. PETERS.
Very briefly, Mr. Chairman, the operation in North Korea does raise the most acute moral and ethnical dilemmas.
The first part of the dilemma is exactly as you have spelled it out.
Is this the kind of arrangement which will keep the regime, the kind that is so distasteful to so many, in power for a longer period of time? If you strongly believe that to be the case, you would take a particular course of action.
The other view focuses on who are the victims.
The victims are the women and they're the children.
And as President Reagan said a hungry child knows no politics.
So the humanitarian community takes the view that it is the ethnical consideration that needs to take primacy.
But we would certainly subscribe to the point of view that it needs to be done thoughtfully, intelligently and in a way which builds toward a better future than the present.
Thank you.
Mr. POWELL.
Well, I go back to my earlier point.
When you deliver aid, you enter into a kind of negotiation, and the negotiations so far are always over security issues.
So that, for instance, the Japanese are now negotiating over delivering food because they want to know what happened to these Japanese who have been kidnapped or allegedly kidnapped.
There are the South Koreans who are offering food only if they get a summit or some kind of diplomatic concessions.
So all these food deals or the fuel that the United States is delivering to North Korea, it's all related to some security issue.
And I think the food aid negotiations should be concentrated on extracting concessions on the monitoring of food and the monitoring of the health of the population so that, at least, the food is given; but at least we really know who is getting that aid.
And the public is really assured that the most vulnerable members are getting the medical aid they need.
I think the failure of the past 7 years has been to allow the WFP to negotiate on its own really and it has to be the full backing of the international community to push the North Koreans on this.
Page 92 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I think, in addition, there should be a sort of step-by-step program to bring the North Koreans to the point where they would do the kind of economic reforms that we've seen in China.
I think there hasn't been a coordinated effort to do this.
And I know the UNDP tried to do that a few years ago, but there were such splits within the major actors that it was ineffective and the North Koreans just walked away from it.
Mr. ROHRABACHER.
One last note and then--thank you, Mr. Chairman, for indulging me just to say let none of us leave any doubt that we're talking about a regime that is a disgrace to all human values, and it's pathetic to see the way they are treating their people.
And just the ignorance and vile of that regime is beyond description.
So I want to make sure that our friends in the press who may or may not have the freedom to say these things that need to be said, need to understand while the American people can be very proud that we are helping people who are hungry; especially, women and children who are hungry, we hold the regime of North Korea in total disdain and we are siding with the people of North Korea and the Korean people and not their pathetic and disgusting government.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you.
Mr. Kirk.
Mr. KIRK.
Dana, what do you really think? I want to give you a face of North Korea that I saw.
I don't know if you can see this.
This is Kim Yo Balk.
Someday I hope to go back to Ho Jang to find her if she's surviving.
We think of North Korea as a weapons factory, but this is the North Korea that I know and have seen on so many faces.
We have a situation in which North Korea has produced a lot of things.
Jasper, you're not a free voting journalist.
Any idea how much--North Korea has shot missiles over Japan--No Dong missile, Taepo Dong missiles.
Any idea how much they've spent building missiles? Page 93 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. BECKER.
I think it's clear evidence they've devoted an enormous amount of resources for a poor country to this program that should have gone into feeding the population.
And I think they see this military hardware as a way of extracting money from the international community as a kind of blackmail.
And that they actually hold the vulnerable population hostage, saying, if you don't give us the aid without conditions, these people will die And I think their sort of negotiating strategy is now pretty clear.
There must come a point when the international community finds it unacceptable and reacts to it.
Mr. KIRK.
Yes.
At a meeting I had in Pyongyang with Kim Ka Ywang they said we're stop selling missiles to Iran for a billion bucks.
It's unfortunate.
Now the Government of Israel now is responding to the North Korean threat because the Shihab III missile, which you see running down the streets of Tehran is just a No Dong that's been repainted with an Iranian flag put on it.
And we know that North Korea missile is pointed at Jerusalem.
So it's a difficult problem to take on.
We also have the KEDO reactor being built by the international community, but it's sort of a deal that doesn't seem to make sense.
Two white elephant nuclear reactions in the middle of North Korea.
But my view of North Korea there is no power grid to connect these reactors to.
There is no way to get the electrical--is that your understanding of what we're building here? Mr. BECKER.
The point is, and the country's already littered with all kinds of white elephants which have failed to put North Korea of path of self-sufficiency.
The huge barrages, which they built on the east coast were designed, actually, to solve the food problem and never worked.
They had the--I think the UNDP started to help them with economic development aid, and the only investors there were some Hong Kong casinos.
I mean, it's absolutely ridiculous what's been going on in North Korea and what many countries have encouraged to happen.
Page 94 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
All of these things are complete irrelevant to solving North Korea's problems.
Mr. KIRK.
North Korea is a country of many white elephants while children starve.
My favorite is the pyramid which is in the center of Pyongyang--a 105-story building.
But it was so sloppily built that the elevator corridors going up the building are like this.
So the building is useless.
No one is going to walk up 105 floors by the stairway.
And so it's a monument to the incompetence of the regime in the middle of the capital city.
But North Korea stands out for other reasons, and to new lows in human rights.
We heard all of these reports of 9-27 prisons.
September 27, 1995, I believe, Kim Jong-Il issued this order to arrest all hungry children outside of their home county.
The security of these facilities doesn't seem to be too heavy.
I ran into dozens of children in China who had escaped from 9-27 prisons.
Now we've heard updated reports that maybe these hungry child prisons don't exist anymore.
Any news on whether 9-27 prisons are still operating or not? Mr. BECKER.
I've heard that many of them have been closed down.
That the order has been to send these children back to their home villages.
But as in the Chinese famine, I mean, the number of homeless or orphans or children who have lost their parents in some way--can't find out where they are is still quite enormous.
I've spoken to children who even been arrested when they going begging around Pyongyang.
Page 95 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
But the problem with North Korea's response to the plight of the homeless children is that they, themselves, don't really recognize the famine for what it actually is.
They don't themselves really live in the sort of realty of what the problems of the country are.
So they continue to live a kind of fantasy, propaganda world, which prevents them from actually responding rationally to what is happening in the country.
Mr. KIRK.
When you turn on the TV in Pyongyang, you'll get videos on how to make Pomjay, alternative food where they're stripping barks off trees and teaching people how to boil this stuff up.
The reason why though we see so many kids without their parents is the structure of Korean culture.
That when the food runs out, the first people who agree to starve to death, or any many cases commit suicide are the grandparents and the parents and then that leaves the homeless kids.
I interviewed some refugees in Yanji who talked about how their grandparents had committed suicide, and that leaves these black swallow children then moving to the North, but the refugee situation is bleak.
These people have no idea what China looks like.
They have no map.
So by the time they crawl across the Tumen River, they're in Jang By Mountain being hunted down by these gangs that sell the girls into sex slavery and almost as horrible conditions in China for the refugees.
So here my other question is we started a huge cross border program in other countries I remember.
I remember a big one, for example, in Afghanistan that we ran out of Pakistan.
Is it time to launch a cross border assistance program for North Korea? Ms. DELAUNAY.
Well, I think first of all, we should recognize these people as refugees.
As people who are starving and have come for help.
This is the first step.
If they are not recognized, there is nothing we can do.
Page 96 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Secondly, you have to be aware that also on the other side of the border control is increasing.
And maybe Tim, I think he knows better than me, but from our experience most of the refugees come from bordering provinces.
And still now a lot of North Korean people do not have access to China, either because it's too far away and they cannot go there or because they have no idea.
They don't know that they might be able to get some food from there.
Mr. KIRK.
I think there is a real moral dilemma that we've seen here that assistance groups that need access to the DPRK cannot condemn the government because then they will be denied access and cannot carry out their basic humanitarian function.
So we've got to develop here in the Congress a two track operation.
Human rights groups, which speak out and deliver the clear message of what's happening and better access to radio-free Asia and hopefully getting cameras inside.
And meanwhile boosting up the humanitarian organizations and their presence and U.S. NGOs in North Korea, but not asking them to do the heavy lifting on human rights because they will be shut down the moment they condemn the regime.
It's that human rights operation that we haven't really launched yet where we're broadcasting the true story of what's going on into North Korea.
And we're assisting North Korean groups in China, in South Korea and elsewhere to get the message out.
And I think that's the essential thing.
Jasper, am I not right? We see this moral dilemma and we can't force the humanitarian groups to speak out on human rights because then they'll be shut down.
But we do have to develop the outside groups that will tell us what's really going on in North Korea.
Page 97 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. BECKER.
Yes, I mean, the key is some free-flow of information, and that's why the refugees are so important.
That's why it's so important to prevent the Chinese government from hunting these people down and expelling them.
Because if we don't have the refugees we won't have any idea what is really going on in the country because in a totalitarian regime like that, I personally believe, with all due respect to Mr. Powell, that it's quite easy to hoodwink visitors and to spend them a line.
And therefore, you need these alternative sources of information.
And you need much more information going into the country.
That should also be a condition of aid, I think.
That they should be--people should be allowed to realize the extent to which they're being artificially deprived of the means to make themselves self-sufficient and to feed themselves.
Mr. KIRK.
And the last point, the food availability situation.
We really should pressure WFP, et cetera, to get a better idea of the food availability situation there.
We're not condemning the regime.
But to my knowledge, the international community has zero access to any farmers markets in North Korea.
Is that correct? Mr. POWELL.
That is correct.
Mr. KIRK.
So we have no idea how much a kilogram of rice costs in North Korea.
And yet, it is sold--I've seen the satellite images.
I forgot the name of the street, Qwan Bach Street in Pyongyang--an enormous 5-mile long market where bulk commodities are sold and the international community assisting North Korea has no idea what the prices are for food in that market.
Have you been to Qwan Bach Street? Mr. POWELL.
You are perfectly correct, which is why I mentioned in my introductory statement that access to farmers markets is one of the key issues which looms very high on our agenda for exactly that purpose.
I think the point that I would especially like to make on farmers markets is that I actually think there is something to be encouraged and facilitated, not something to be afraid of or call them black markets in order to close them down.
Page 98 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. KIRK.
Right.
I think the legitimatization of farmers markets is key to increasing food availability.
And while we can't force WFP to get into the reactor and find out what's going on there.
We should have some pretty hard line on getting WFP to get into the farmers markets to improve food availability distributions, even through micro-loans, which I think would be an enormous help for them.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. LEACH.
Thank you very much.
Let me thank this panel and also express great admiration on behalf of the Congress for the work you do.
And several of the observations that have been made are things I'm confident this government is going to have to take seriously in terms of foreign policy initiatives.
So we thank you all.
[Recess.]
Mr. LEACH.
If the Subcommittee can come back to order.
Our second panel is composed of Dr. Norbert Vollertsen, who is a German physician who spent 18 months inside North Korea providing humanitarian medical assistance with access to regions outside Pyongyang.
After his expulsion from North Korea in December of 2000, he has traveled the world campaigning for human rights in North Korea.
Mr. Kim Sung Min was a captain in the North Korean Army at the time of his defection in 1996.
He appears today as the director of the North Korean Defectors Volunteer Group of the Committee to Help North Korean Refugees, a Seoul-based NGO that collected nearly 12 million signatures inside South Korea supporting refugee status for North Koreans inside China, which it delivered to the United Nations.
Page 99 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Ms. Sun-ok Lee is a former party official inside North Korea and a survivor of several years inside a North Korean political prisoner camp.
She's the author of the book Eyes of the Tailless Animals, an account of her imprisonment.
And finally, Mr. Lee Young-Kook served as a personal bodyguard for a North Korean leader, Kim Jong-Il, for a decade, and later survived years in a North Korea prison camp before escaping into China and eventually South Korea.
And I understand has also written a book about his experience.
We will begin in the order of the introductions with Dr. Vollertsen.
Dr. Vollertsen? STATEMENT OF NORBERT VOLLERTSEN, FORMER MEDICAL DOCTOR INSIDE NORTH KOREA Dr. VOLLERTSEN.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Ladies and gentlemen, unfortunately, most of the people are gone to lunch.
Maybe that's one of the most problems of North Korea.
Here are now the eye witness of human rights violations in North Korea, but there is nearly nobody who can listen.
There is nearly no more attention.
Unfortunately, even some of the congressmen are gone.
I think bad timing.
Sorry for that comment.
I was a German emergency doctor.
I lived in North Korea for 1 1/2 years.
I took care for 10 different hospitals, several orphanages and several kindergartens all over North Korea.
I got a lot of access.
I lived there for 1 1/2 years.
And I came closer to those people who are in need.
Page 100 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I learned about food distribution.
I learned about the medical situation.
The medical situation in North Korea, to make it very brief, there is no power.
There is no electricity.
There is no medicine.
There is no bandage material.
There is nothing.
After 2 weeks, I got the opportunity to get closer to the North Korean people because there was one burnt patient of mine who suffered from his burns, and there was a skin donation from the North Korean people because they do not have any medical supplies, they gave their own skin to their citizen.
My colleague and I, we joined this operation and afterwards we were awarded this friendship medal.
The first two Westerners ever who got such a high honor, and I got closer access to the elite.
I was invited to many, many festivities of all those generals and all those who are in charge of power in the foreign ministry.
I learned about this life style in North Korea.
Nice buffets and casinos, nightclubs--Chinese nightclubs.
I was invited to all those facilities.
I learned about internet access.
I learned about satellite television.
I learned about people who are not in need.
And in the countryside I took care for my patients.
These are the people in North Korea.
These are the starving children.
I wondered about the difference.
I do not know where the international food aid is going to.
I simply ask this question about the difference of those two pictures.
I stayed in North Korea 1 1/2 years.
And in the beginning I tried to be a Sunshine politician.
I even gave my own skin for one of them.
Then I changed my attitude.
I saw there was some more power needed.
There is the power of the international media needed in order to show what's going on in North Korea.
So I invited many, many of those journalists to a private tour.
Together with my friendship medal, I got a so-called VIP passport and a private driving license.
I was allowed to travel around on my own without any minor, without any guide, without any translator, without any driver.
So I got a lot of access in North Korea.
I made secretly 2500 photos, mainly of my patients in the hospitals.
But also, I made secretly a video tape of the situation in these hospitals.
And I wanted to show it to the international journalists.
Page 101 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Because this offended the North Korean authorities, I was expelled the first time.
The most worst thing happened to my translator.
He disappeared.
I never saw him again and I never saw his family again.
One week later, I found an obviously tortured solider on the middle of the road.
He had cigarette burns on his back and marks where he was beaten--where he was whipped.
I tried to get the evidence to show it to you.
I was not allowed to do so.
I was nearly arrested.
My camera was taken away.
I was disciplined again.
I was threatened to be expelled again.
So there is no possibility to get any evidence outside of North Korea.
There is no possibility to get any pictures outside of so-called reform institutions.
I learned about this reform institutions by a very simple method.
I buy the original criminal law of North Korea in Pyongyang, and there it's written in Article 46, ''A person who encourage others to attempt the overthrow, the disruption or the undermining of the republic or to commit other anti-state criminal acts shall be committed to a reform institution for up to 7 years and there he will be reformed through labor.''
I just wondered about the image of these reform institutions.
I thought when this is the normal situation in the children's hospital in North Korea, how it might have looked in those so-called reform institutions.
These are labor camps.
And you can prove it simply with this criminal law.
So I thought the outside world has to know.
I wanted to inform the journalists.
So after I was expelled in the end of 2000, I went to Seoul.
I published books.
I spoke to the international journalists, but there was not nearly enough attention.
So we tried to get more attention, more media attention.
I think only with the power of the media we can change the situation of those children.
I tried to contact those groups who are in charge to take the refugees out of North Korea.
And we succeed to stage those incidents in Beijing at those Western embassies.
And we will try to do more.
I'm from Germany.
I think I have to speak out about this.
Even when there are only rumors about concentration camps in North Korea, I speak out because you know about German history.
We were accused that nobody was outspoken.
That nobody acted.
We failed to act.
So I think that should not happen again.
Page 102 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I have to speak and I have to believe in the power of refugees.
That means a land of refugees can lead to the final collapse of a terror regime.
And North Korea is a terror regime.
They are committing genocide there.
They are responsible for those people.
They are using food as a weapon against their own people.
They are committing genocide, and I think we have to care.
As an international community, we have to intervene.
And when are talking here about food aid, we have to talk about how to get the collapse of North Korea--of this regime.
Otherwise, we're all responsible that we kept silent because this in North Korea are the real killing fields of the 21st Century.
And it's a shame that this is still existing and nobody knows.
Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Vollertsen follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF NORBERT VOLLERTSEN, FORMER MEDICAL DOCTOR INSIDE NORTH KOREA I was a member of a German medical group, Cap Anamur, and entered North Korea in July 1999 to carry out humanitarian medical assistance.
I remained in North Korea for 18 month until I was expelled on Dec. 30, 2000 for publicly denouncing the regime for abusing basic human rights and for its failure to distribute the massive foreign food aid to the people who needed it most.
Early on during my stay I was summoned to treat a workman who had been badly burned by molten iron.
My colleague at that time and I volunteered our own skin to be grafted onto this patient in order to show our friendship with the ordinary North Korean citizens.
For this action we were nationally acclaimed by the media and awarded with the Friendship medal, the only two western foreigners ever to receive this high honor.
Page 103 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Together with this medal I was issued a somewhat VIP-passport and a driver's license, which allowed me to travel to many areas inaccessible to foreigners and to ordinary North Koreans citizens.
I even secretly photographed my patients and their decrepit surroundings.
While acting as an Emergency doctor and looking for the victims of many accidents I also visited a number of other hospitals in other provinces beside the official ten hospitals and three orphanages I was assigned to.
In order to deliver clothes to the North Korean children I also visited several dozens kindergartens all over the country side.
In every hospital I visited I found unbelievable deprivation and I was shocked to see patients and orphans in these places.
There were no bandages, no scalpels, no antibiotics, no operation facilities--only broken wooden beds supporting starving children waiting to die.
In the hospitals the doctors were constantly using empty beer bottles as vessels for dripping, and safety razors as scalpels--there was even an appendectomy without any anaesthesia.
They insisted on the serious shortage of medical products and equipment while I found throughout my ''investigations'' that there was a large stock of bandages and other medical goods in governmental storehouses and in diplomatic shops.
There are two worlds in North Korea.
The world for the senior military, the members of the workers party and the country's elite where they are enjoying a nice lifestyle with fancy restaurants, diplomatic shops with European food, nightclubs and even an casino and the world for the ordinary people.
Page 104 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In the world for these ordinary people in a hospital one can see young children, all of them too small for their age, with hollow eyes and skin stretched tight across their faces, wearing blue-and-white-striped pajamas like the children in Auschwitz and Dachau in Hitler's Nazi Germany.
Most of the patients in the hospitals suffer from psychosomatic illnesses, worn out by compulsory drills, the innumerable parades, the assemblies from 6:00 in the morning and the droning propaganda.
They are tired and at the end of their tether.
Clinical depression is rampant.
Alcoholism is common because of mind numbing rigidities and hopelessness of life.
The patients in the North Korean hospitals are looking exhausted and fed up.
The condition of the children was deplorable, emaciated, stunted, mute, emotionally depleted.
Young adults have no hope, no future and anxiety is everywhere.
One can only wonder why there are so many orphans.
Constraints and difficulties of operating in North Korea effect any accountable humanitarian aid assistance.
There is no effective monitoring because there is no freedom of movement for the international humanitarian aid agencies.
Nobody really knows where the food is going to.
Before Cap Anamur came to North Korea other humanitarian agencies like MSF, OXFAM, ACF and CARE pulled out of North Korea, because they were not allowed to distribute the aid directly to the people.
They had to turn it over to the government for the authorities to carry out the distribution and it is not possible to proof if a substantial portion of the foreign aid is going to the army or to those with status or sold to other countries.
I myself did not witness any improvement in the availability of food and medicine or in the general living conditions during my whole staying.
Page 105 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Knowledge about the overall humanitarian situation in North Korea is also not available for the normal foreign visitor, aid worker or diplomat.
Protection of the humanitarian interests of the population is not possible.
General social and political rights, as basic rights grants to human beings in freedom of speech, the press, assembly, demonstration, ideology, religion and association are restricted in North Korea.
There is no activity in any of the churches in Pyongyang.
It is a showcase for all the foreign visitors.
When we were shown around the ''priest'' was only talking about the money-investment for the church, Kim Jong-IL and his goodwill towards the Christian community but there was no word about religion.
And--what surprised us the most--when the priest talked about the open service in the church every sunday morning we found all the seats in the church full of dust--never used in the last months, maybe years.
. . .
Also whenever I passed the church on a sunday morning there was actually no activity--not even one of the 300 or 400 Christians the priest was talking about.
In North Korea the life of the workers has reached its limit, the life of the peasants is in a desperate condition too.
The deprivation of the basic right to exist is obvious.
The ordinary people are starving and dying.
Violation of the freedom of personal inviolability and conscience by unwarranted arrest and detention is common and one can only imagine what the conditions are like in the so-called ''reform institutions'', where entire families are imprisoned when any member does or says something that offends the regime.
These camps are closed to all foreigners, even the International Federation of the Red Cross has been denied access.
Page 106 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In the last Stalinist country on earth sexual violence against women, used like modern ''comfort women'', forced labor and torture is an important mean for maintaining the suppression of any opposition.
A repressive apparatus is acting whenever there is any criticism and the constriction of human rights by intelligence surveillance, shadowing, wiretapping and mail interception is enormous.
The oppressive nature of the police forces is evident and obvious at every street corner.
If the main medical diagnosis in North Korea is fear and depression because of man-made policy and not because of ''natural disasters'' one has to think about the right therapy and to speak out publicly about repression and human right abuses.
I realized that the only way to rescue people in North Korea in poverty and difficulty is to let the world know the real state of this country.
So according to my extended possibilities with the friendship medal I guided around Pyongyang a group of journalists accompanying Mrs Albright, the then U.S. Secretary of State who visited North Korea in the autumn of 2000.
Additionally, I spoke to every diplomat and after I found an obviously tortured soldier I handed over a statement of humanitarian principles to the North Korean government.
My so-called coordinator and minder at that time who was made responsible for not preventing my activities was exchanged.
I never saw him and his family again.
My behavior offended the leaders of the workers party and I was forbidden to go to the hospitals anymore, my car was sabotaged and finally I was forced to leave the country.
As promised to the North Korean authorities I went directly to Seoul instead of going home to Germany and spoke to the international journalists there.
In the following months I also interviewed several hundreds North Korean defectors in Seoul, at the Chinese-North Korean border and in several other places where they are hiding themselves in order to learn more about the cruel reality in their home country.
Page 107 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
All the former prisoners of the concentration-camps were talking about mass-execution, torture, rape, murder, baby-killing and other crimes against humanity because they were punished for any ''antistate criminal acts''.
Working closely with the media the international community has to put pressure on the North Korean regime to open up toward the outside world and save the ordinary citizens lives.
To improve human rights in North Korea the world has to speak out against the current regime.
The regime of Kim Jong-IL is committing crimes against humanity, they are using food as a weapon against their own people.
Kim Jong-IL is responsible for genocide, North Korea is a real terror state with terror against his own people and therefore the leadership of this country has to face the International Criminal Court in The Hague.
As a German born after the war I know too well the guilt of my grandparents' generation for remaining silent while the Nazis where committing indescribable crimes.
I felt it my duty as a human being, particularly as a German to expose the crimes and tyranny of the North Korean regime.
And as a German I know about the impact of refugees who are fleeing the country.
Like in former East Germany where it started with several dozen refugees in the West German Embassy in Prague it will lead to the final collapse of the system.
After visiting the United States, Japan and Europe I will subsequently continue all over the world for the express purpose of exposing the tyranny and criminality of this secret state, with the hope that international pressure will be applied by the world community to bring about a reformation of this depraved ''mad place''.
Page 108 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. LEACH.
Well, thank you very much, Mr. Vollertsen.
Before turning to the next witness, let me indicate a matter of congressional procedure.
There will be votes on the Floor in the not too distant future.
At which point we will have to interrupt proceedings.
And so it's possible that when one of you is talking, we will have to interrupt the proceeding and then reconvene at a time somewhat later.
I apologize for the circumstance, but several very important issues are before the Floor this afternoon.
Our next witness is Mr. Kim Sung-min, who is a former captain in the North Korean Army.
We have an interpreter, Mr. Young Lim, who will assist him, if needed, and the other witnesses if needed.
Mr. Kim, please proceed as you see fit.
STATEMENT OF KIM SUNG MIN, DEFECTOR AND DIRECTOR OF NORTH KOREAN DEFECTORS' VOLUNTEER GROUP, COMMITTEE TO HELP NORTH KOREAN REFUGEES Mr. KIM.
Thank you, Chairman.
I wish to thank you first and I understand I am here to talk about the human rights issues in North Korea.
And although I deeply thank you for your invitation, I am saddened that I am not at the Congress or National Assembly of my own country, the Republic of Korea, but rather in the United States Congress.
I wish to talk you and your Committee based on my own experience on the problems of human rights and the problems of North Korean refugees in China.
I came to South Korea in 1999.
And in the beginning of my life in South Korea, I used to call the dear leader's name only ''Kim Jong-Il'' said such and such.
Then the people around me, including the South Koreans, were correcting me, reprimanding me that I was not using the honors such as ''Dear Leader Kim Jong-Il.''
Page 109 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Since then, a year and a half has past, and at present I still am to say Kim Jong-Il says so.
Kim Jong-Il did such and such.
Now I'm corrected not having called him Defense Commissioner Kim Jong-Il.
The one I know, Kim Jong-Il, is the person responsible who murdered more than 1 million people of my home--my country.
I also served in the North Korean Army.
He is also responsible for having soldiers die of starvation and malnourishment.
And he should be the person responsible.
The one I know, Kim Jong-Il, is the one who orders 23 million North Koreans to do what he wants them to do and what his regime wants them to do.
Again, considering South Korea, the one I know, Kim Jong-Il, is the one who caused 70 million--the entire Korean people--to be used for his own personal benefit.
Sometimes it's said that Kim Jong-Il is ignorant of the outside world.
He does not pay attention to what's happening other than in his own country, but that is not true.
He is listening and watching everything that's taking place.
I'm sure he is watching and listening right now to what's going on right here.
Having said that, I wish to report to you the misery, the tragedy the Korean people are suffering with in North Korea today.
Outside North Korea, they say North Korean soldiers are well off, living well, well fed; but that is not so.
I served in the North Korean Army for 16 years.
In 1992 and 1993 I saw 12 fellow soldiers dying of malnourishment.
Page 110 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
North Korean soldiers get rations with salt and rice, and due to eating only salt and rice, they would naturally be malnourished.
In 1991, North Koreans were given daily rations of rice and some other mixed grains and the rest was ordered to be provided by self-sufficiency.
Authorities of the Army will feed the soldiers other than the ration of salt and rice and some other mixed grains.
On April 15th and February 15th, two national celebration days, for example, Kim Il-Sung's birthday and Kim Jong-Il's birthday, soldiers were given one kilogram of pork, but it acted as if it poisoned the malnourished person's empty stomach.
The oil went inside and the soldiers would have diarrhea, and diarrhea would not stop.
So they would die.
In one year I saw 12 soldiers dying with my own eyes, and felt so sad and miserable.
Mr. LEACH.
If I could interrupt.
I apologize to you, Mr. Kim.
But the buzzers and the lights you see in the clock indicate that there is a vote on the Floor.
And what I would like to do is to interrupt your testimony.
It is extremely moving and extremely important.
But what we will do is interrupt it for this time and then return and then we'll come back to you, Mr. Kim, to finish your testimony before turning to the other witnesses.
So I would like to adjourn this meeting, pending the vote, and indicate that we probably won't reconvene until about 20 minutes after 1 o'clock.
So you're free to visit in the halls or whatever you may need to do during that time period.
The Committee is in recess until 1:20 p.m. [Recess.]
Page 111 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. LEACH.
The Subcommittee will reconvene.
And when we broke, Mr. Kim was in the middle of very compelling testimony.
And I apologize to him for this interruption.
But please, if you would proceed as he sees fit.
Mr. KIM.
Thank you, Chairman, for being kind to me and to us.
While I was in the Army, I've seen people dying of starvation inside the Army and outside the Army in the neighborhoods.
And according to the labor party secretary, Hwang Jang Yop, he estimated those died of starvation to be 1.5 million and 2 million.
In order to escape death by starvation, one would flee North Korea.
We call them escapees or refugees into China.
The number of those refugees, according to the South Korean government, is 40 to 45,000.
But Kim Song Chul, who leads a national movement for the refugees, his estimate is 200,000.
Chairman, with respect, I will not talk anymore on the inhuman realities of North Korea or the tragedies experienced by the North Korean refugees in China.
Though I wish to report to you that, not the South Korean government, but the people in South Korea and the Korean-Americans, mainly Christians in New York and Washington, DC, are trying to hard to help North Korean refugees in China.
As of April 2002, these Korean-American christians are collecting signatures to have those North Korean refugees in China acquire status as international refugees.
And I'm told that the number of signatures has reached 11,700,000.
We also have the problem of China.
They are challenging human conscience and the dignity of human beings, their humanity.
But as long as we all are trying hard together such a barrier will be disassembled and the problem of human rights will be solved.
I thank you so very much, Chairman.
Page 112 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
[The prepared statement of Mr. Kim follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF KIM SUNG MIN, DEFECTOR AND DIRECTOR OF NORTH KOREAN DEFECTORS' VOLUNTEER GROUP, COMMITTEE TO HELP NORTH KOREAN REFUGEES On October 1st, 1995, I left my hometown, where I was born and had spent more than 30 years, with happy and sorrowful memories.
Yes, it was and still is my hometown.
But when I was leaving, there was no one shedding tears or saying a prayer or two for the uncertain future ahead of me.
There was not even a hint of sadness in that moment of separation.
Having lost both parents in my early teens, my hometown meant nothing to me but hunger, loneliness and despair.
Since I was fourteen, I drifted from one 'home' to another learning how to cope with hunger and to read others' faces trying to become a good boy.
In 1978, as a seventeen-year-old boy, I was conscripted into the North Korean People's Army, Kim Jong Il's most favored organization, for 10 years and one month.
During all those years, I was a well-trained war machine who was ready to do whatever was needed under the banner of ''Reunify the country with the red force.''
Upon completion of military service in 1988, I was admitted to the Kim Hyung Jik College of Education.
When I graduated from the college four years later, I got a letter of appointment from the authorities, which made me an officer of the People's Army.
For a man who had spent a total of 15 years in a military uniform, the military spirit naturally became the supreme value of life.
Nothing else could match that.
Page 113 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Then, a thunderous news hit me one day.
It was the death of 'our great leader' Kim Il Sung, who had been to me, like to everyone else in North Korea, the Immortal Sun.
His death was followed by bizarre and appalling rumors, such as hungry people killing each other to eat their flesh.
As if to confirm those rumors, people often saw corpses of elderly people and children in dark corners of city streets or remote mountain trails.
Every station and every street market began to be crowded with elderly people and children who were either abandoned or ran away for lack of food.
Listening to their horror stories, I could not help but ask myself what I was doing as a member of the People's Army whose duty should be to protect the people from all evil forces.
I concluded from the terrible experiences that the politics of the Republic had nothing to do with the welfare and happiness of its people and that the Democratic People's Republic of Korea was born only to kill democracy on this land.
This absurd society, where one segment was busy with talks about Kim Jong Il's succession as if preparing a coronation while people in other segments were starving, made me really sick.
The moment of choice came for me, and I chose freedom and a better life.
One day I crossed the Tumen River, the border waterway between China and North Korea.
As I was a runaway military officer on the active list, getting caught meant instant execution, and every step I took on that foreign soil was crucial to saving my life.
My only hope was to go to South Korea somehow, but I didn't know how.
For a North Korean refugee, finding things to eat is a major daily concern; no passage was open to that land of hope and safety.
Finally, I arrived at the destination of my long journey, the Korean embassy in China.
However, nothing was further away from my expectation than their reception.
''Go away quickly and go back! What if the Chinese police catch you? We have no way to handle cases like yours.''
Without knowing it, I was clenching my fists and my teeth, and a streak of blood was running from my mouth.
They didn't seem to have the slightest idea about what North Korean refugees in China like me were going through.
Page 114 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
By mentioning the Chinese police and this and that excuse, they succeeded in driving me away.
I spat and spat at them, at their inhumanity even to their brothers.
Frustrating though it was, I had no choice but to continue my personal exodus to the land of freedom and safety.
I somehow managed to sneak to the port city of Dalian and was lucky to find a Korean merchant ship.
As night fell, I proceeded to the ship.
But then, a group of Chinese armed police rushed out of the darkness and handcuffed me without asking questions.
I was escorted to the police station in Dalian's port, and put in jail.
Two days later, on February 24th, I was transferred to the City of Dalian's prison, where on the way I was escorted by three Chinese officials, including the chief of the External Affairs Department of the city's Public Security Bureau.
I had to stay in that cell with Chinese petty criminals for about forty days, while they conducted an investigation and waited for the decision from higher authorities.
Anyway, that is what I was told.
I pleaded with them whenever I found the opportunity, often with tears, not to send me back to North Korea, saying, ''I would rather stay here in prison all my life than go back and be executed.''
It was useless.
Soon I was transferred to Tumen, under the escort of five armed guards.
The fact that Tumen is a border town near North Korea was good enough to drive me into a state of terror.
Looking at those who took me in, I realized instantly that they were specialists in dealing with refugees from North Korea, like me.
The first thing they told me to do was to take off all my clothes to search for something only they knew.
I had to give them all I had, my body and clothes, so they could do their ''search,'' trembling with shame and fear.
Then, they roughly pushed me to a wall, and began taking pictures of my front, my back, my sides and every part of me.
Abysmal shame and terror overpowered me, and I became an animal that was half dead.
Page 115 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
After the search, they dragged me further inside through 2 sets of iron doors, and put me into a tiny prison cell, which I shared with seven of my countrymen who had also escaped from North Korea for a variety of reasons.
The room had neither windows nor a ventilation system.
The heavy iron door I had just passed through was the only path to the outside world.
I wondered if I would die from lack of oxygen, even though my cellmates assured me that no one had died because of that, at least until then.
In the room there was a spy camera at one corner of the ceiling, a toilet pot like a toy, and several pieces of dirty, ragged blankets and pillows.
This is one of the detention camps located at the border between China and North Korea, which China built to put away the North Korean refugees they catch.
The detention camp at Tumen, which is managed by special agents of the Chinese Security Bureau (similar to the U.S. CIA), Jilin Province, is completely segregated from the outside world by high walls and barbed wire.
Even within the camp building, every movement by inmates is closely monitored and controlled by the three iron doors and one prison gate as well as the well-trained guards.
What is waiting for these refugees is forced repatriation to North Korea, a situation they want to avoid at any cost.
To prevent refugees from taking any drastic action, camp officials often cajole them by saying that they might send them to the so-called ''Farm for Brainwashing through Labor'' in China rather than send them back to North Korea if the refugees cooperate with them by adhering to the camp regulations.
That is why inmates try to survive in the camp.
One should have been smart enough to realize that what they were saying were complete lies, and taken certain resolute measures.
But in such an unusual situation, people often make the wrong decision, and so did I.
I decided to stay calm and cooperate with them, hoping to be transferred some day to the farm they talked about.
I gave honest answers to their questions about when and where I had been in China, and whom I met and for what reason, etc., etc.
Their interrogation lasted for days, often interrupted because they wanted to check if I was giving correct answers.
Page 116 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Then, one day I was told to come out to the prison yard, where two soldiers were waiting for my arrival.
They dashed over to me, handcuffed me, and pushed me into a van.
The van was already on the Tumen Bridge even before I knew what was going on.
It takes only five minutes to the Tumen Bridge by van from the camp.
By the time I realized what was happening to me, I was right there in North Korea, the last place I wanted to be on earth.
I was handed over to a group of North Korean soldiers that took part in the ritual of changing handcuffs, from Chinese to North Korean state property.
As if well prepared for my arrival, the North Korean soldiers dragged me to Kim Il Sung's Tower of Immortality, a monument erected at a place directly opposite the Domun (Tumen) Customs House.
There, a man who said he was the director of Onseong-gun Office of the National Defense Agency, the powerful military organization that could be compared to the CIA of the U.S., introduced me to a crowd of civilians who were gathered around the tower for my arrival, using the term ''bandong-bunja (reactionary),'' a title that I had become so familiar with.
He told the crowd to look at me closely to see what a traitor looked like, and had me walk among them.
Angry shouts of ''you, dirty rat,'' ''you, betrayer,'' and ''die, you turncoat'' were shouted at me.
Some spat in my face, and some threw their shoes at me.
Then, I was hit by a stone on my forehead, and heard loud cheers coming from the crowd.
The cheering made these people even more excited, and soon my face and head became covered with blood from the stones hitting me.
I kept walking, and cursed not them, my poor countrymen, but myself, for the stupidity of having not killed myself in front of the Korean Embassy or while in the detention camp in Tumen.
After the ritual, I was escorted to the Onseong-gun Office of the National Defense Agency.
Page 117 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I have heard that there are talks about North Korean refugees going on at the United Nations, whether the refugees should be treated as political refugees or illegal immigrants who left their country just for economic reasons.
One thing I can say to those who are involved in the debate is that in North Korea all North Koreans who escaped their country with reasons similar to mine are treated as political offenders.
My case clearly shows this.
As soon as I was taken into the building of the Onseong-gun's NDA, they started to 'interrogate' me under the charge of high treason.
It was an interrogation session conducted more by physical abuse than by words.
They didn't ask me who I was, where I lived, what I did at home and abroad and why I committed such a horrible crime of betraying my own country.
It wasn't important to them, or perhaps they already knew all about me and others who were in the same situation.
They broke my fingers, ballooned my face, and pickled my whole body in dark blood.
After going through the hell of the ''preliminary interrogation'' that seemed to last forever, I was then put in a prison cell where lice and fleas were waiting for me.
Every minute I prayed to God to put an end to my suffering, to take my life.
After eight days of imprisonment in the Onseong-gun Office of the NDA, I was put on a train to Pyongyang, escorted by armed guards from the Headquarters of the NDA.
''You too are a poor little thing,'' said the military officer leading the guards, in response to my question of where we were going.
''Don't you know? What do you think a thing like you deserves but execution by a firing squad? Your colleagues are waiting for you, and there will be a public trial for you five days from now,'' he added.
Page 118 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Now was the time to get myself killed, I thought.
I couldn't bear the thought of being shot dead as a traitor to the Republic in front of the soldiers I had once led as their captain.
I made the decision to jump off the train, even if to be killed by the train wheels.
Passing by Sinseongchon Station near Pyongyang, I jumped off the running train, and found that I once again had become a free man instead of a dead man.
I ran and ran and ran toward the north.
On April 3rd, I crossed the Tumen River again to re-start life as an illegal immigrant, which would last for nearly four years.
Thanks to God, my horror story suddenly took a turn for the best on February 9th, 1999, when I was admitted to the country where I always wanted to be, the Republic of Korea, which was, and still is, a true Republic to me.
Now, as a man who survived all kinds of inhuman conditions through the valley of the shadow of death and now living in a free society, I have something to tell the conscience of mankind.
What I have to say is, of course, about the North Korean refugees in China, a group of people, including children and women, who are leading among the most tragic of lives in the world today.
No one exactly knows how many there are.
The suggested figures among humanitarian groups or concerned government officials vary widely from none to thousands or even to millions.
The truth is that a great number of these refugees are being caught, treated inhumanely and repatriated by force back to ''their own country'' to be drowned, tortured, maimed, hanged, or shot to death.
Pretending not to have seen anything, we have encouraged those who inflict indescribable pain, both mental and physical, on these helpless human beings.
It is a great shame for both Korea and the world.
I plead particulary with people in the South to pay closer attention to the horrific situation which their brothers and sisters are subjected to.
It cannot be a matter just for the Chinese and North Korean governments.
It is a matter to be dealt with by the South Korean government from a historical perspective as well as a matter over which the future generations of reunified Korea will ponder again and again.
Page 119 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
It is too cruel, or too foolish, for parents to haggle with doctors over hospital fees when there is a loving baby dying in an emergency room.
There certainly are laws and procedures to be followed in international affairs, but I believe that the universal law of human rights should come first.
We should do everything to make this clear for the reactionary governments of China and North Korea until they give up their policies of killing innocent people.
The tragedy of North Korean refugees should end right now.
Mr. LEACH.
Well, thank you very much, Mr. Kim.
Ms. Lee? STATEMENT OF SUN-OK LEE, FORMER PRISON AND CAMP SURVIVOR Ms. LEE. Chairman Leach, my name is Lee Sun-Ok, who escaped North Korea in search of freedom into South Korea with my son, Choi Dong Chul.
Today, I have an opportunity to provide testimony to your Committee, and I thank you very much for such an opportunity.
Before I report to you of my own personal experiences, I wish to cover in summary to help your understanding of the current status of human rights violations in North Korea.
If I describe in one word the status of North Korean human rights, the best concept for Westerners would be that such thing does not exist.
The people of North Korea do not even have the term ''human rights.''
And even if they did, they wouldn't know the basis of human rights.
They do not understand human rights.
Page 120 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Kim Jong-Il's regime is neither socialism nor communism.
Its political system is Kim Jong-Il's own one person, one party political system.
In order to maintain his dictatorial regime, he has established numerous political prisons and camps.
When the international organizations demand those political prisoners to be freed from those camps and prisons, North Korea's answer is provided in a lie that there are no political prisons or camps.
There are political prison camps in 12 different regions in North Korea.
They euphemistically call these political prisons or camps to be reform institutes or reform facilities.
And in one facility, one institute, there could be from 6,000 prisoners up to 10,000 prisoners.
The biggest one would even have 30,000.
The dictatorial regime of Kim Jong-Il unconditionally imprisons those who are critical of his dictatorship.
Those who are in the political prisons or the reform institutes number nearly 200,000.
Those who are held at the reform institute or facility are deprived of even the very basic rights as a human being.
And they are excluded from demographic statistics in North Korea.
So they could be called inhuman human beings.
Those who are held in the reform institute or the facility are not free to even talk to each other.
And in the case of women, they are prohibited to give birth to babies.
In North Korea, even today, guilt by association is applied and it's a crime.
If one member of the family is determined to be put into reform institute, the entire family has to follow him or her to the reform institute.
That applied to myself also.
Once I was taken to the reform institute, my family, including my husband and son, were expelled from the positions they were holding and put into the camp for forced labor.
Page 121 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Right now, currently, horrible things are taking place in North Korean reform institutes or political prisons and camps unimaginable by the people in the West.
In North Korea there is an annual pre-plan for how many people have to be taken into those political prisons and camps.
In order to achieve such a quota, innocent people are tortured to make false confessions.
In my case, also, I suffered.
I was an innocent person, but I had to suffer 14 months in a secret underground torture room.
At that time, I was working as a head of a local material supply center.
And my crime was that as the person in charge I was neglectful of properly dispensing the material under my charge.
But Kim Jong-Il was responsible and he was unable to give me the material for my distribution for the local residents.
Suffering these various types of tortures, I lost left side teeth, eight of them.
And also on the left side of my face, I still have the facial paralysis as the after effect of the torture.
In the reform institute in Kaechon where I was held, there were 200 women housewives as prisoners.
In the case of these women, if any is pregnant, the baby would be killed.
If a baby's mom was a political criminal, inside her the baby is the same political criminal.
So the seed of a political criminal should not be allowed to be born.
That's why the baby was killed inside of her.
I have seen the true scenes of killing babies inside and those babies could be 7-, 8-, 9-months-old.
Despite all this, if a baby was strong enough to live on, I saw a medical officer stepping on the baby's neck with his boots once he or she was born.
If the mom would cry for help to save her child, it was an expression of dissatisfaction against the party.
So such a woman would be dragged out of the building and put to public execution by firing squad.
Page 122 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The North Korean dictator, Kim Jong-Il, is not interested in acquiring any foodstuffs for the people.
But he is busy producing ammunition on a huge scale, too much ammunition, that will be used to kill his own people.
At this public execution by firing squad of a weak woman, she was tied to a iron post.
There were six in the firing squad and each had three rounds of ammunition, firing at the weak woman's chest.
So she was shot by 18 rounds in her chest.
While the mom was watching, the baby was killed, taken out, put in a bucket, and taken to the laboratory for experimentation.
I have seen so many people put to death at Kaechon during my 7 years in the reform institute.
Things that should not be done by a human being are being done.
Not a laboratory rat, but a live human body is being used for experimentation.
The worst kind of political criminal in North Korea is considered to be one who believes in God or Heaven rather than the great leader god of North Korea.
I have seen hundreds who suffered pain all their lives and were finally killed at the Kaechon reform institute only because they said they believed in God.
The family members of those were imprisoned, even a 3-year old granddaughter or grandson, only because their grandfather was a Christian.
They were all put in together in the family camp.
In 1990 I had an opportunity to go and see Kaechon political camp, which was next to where I was at, the Kaechon reform institute.
That's where I saw the children isolated in their own children's camp and mothers are isolated away from their children in mothers' camp.
Page 123 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Those children who stayed there for more than 10 years, for example, would not be able to recognize their mother's face.
I have spent 7 years in a political reform institute and I have seen horrors and tragedies of the worst kind.
And I wish to ask the international community if such a regime in North Korea could ever be forgivable? In my case, my loving husband and son, only because they were members of my family, had to live so long in such a painful place.
I believe the international community, including the Republic of Korea, is being cheated by the Kim Jong-Il regime.
As I sit in front of you to provide testimony, I'm full of honor and a sense of duty that I should continue on sitting here and work until the day the North Korean political system crumbles down and, thanks to the international community's public opinion, those horrible political prisons and camps are disestablished.
I only wish for all of us who are sitting here to imagine that each and every member of our family is suffering in that political prison.
And with such a consistent and long-lasting interest I hope the North Korean people will be helped.
The population of 23 million people in North Korea is only a pawn held by Kim Jong-Il.
In the 1980s North Korea was not open to the rest of the world or to the international community, but it is open because Kim Jong-Il is asking for economic and food aid.
He is asking for help.
North Korea's Kim Jong-Il comments on South Korea's Sunshine policy are: ''South Korea's Sunshine policy was successful to make South Koreans take off their jacket, but not the coat I'm wearing.''
Page 124 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I have lived through almost 50 years in North Korea with all these pains under such a harsh dictatorship.
And I know the system so well, therefore, my disappointment is greater.
In talking to North Korea the priority the international community should be set on, to include South Korea, is not dialogue with North Korea.
It should be the international community's demand by public opinion that improvement in human rights in North Korea should proceed in order to have any dialogue.
All the support and aid given to North Korea from the international community, including South Korea, was successful in only in the aspect that it prolonged Kim Jong-Il's regime.
Since the North Korean regime is having its own people in their own country starved, naturally, there will be many who escape away from home to China, to South Korea, since they couldn't make a living in their own country.
And now they are homeless wanderers and starving, asking for food.
A person like me, guilty of having been born in North Korea was forced to leave home, North Korea.
Those who left North Korea and escaped to other countries are not taken care of by the international community.
I escaped North Korea, went to Beijing and found the South Korean Embassy in Beijing.
Holding my son's hand, I entered the South Korean Embassy in Beijing and asked for political asylum.
The South Korean Embassy in Beijing coldly rejected and expelled us out of the facility, myself and my son.
This has happened not only to me, but also to many, many people who run away from North Korea.
Currently, today, there are these people who do not have their own nation, who are not attended to by the international community, and they are living a beggar's life.
Page 125 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
It is high time for the international community, including South Korea, to hold Kim Jong-Il responsible.
I do not believe there could be such a ruler who could rule his or her people while unable to feed them.
I believe the one leader who could not be held responsible for his own people should be expelled out of the international community.
Eighty percent of the annual budget of North Korea is used for manufacturing and in the sales of weapons systems for war.
Out of a sense of duty, I wrote a book about the cruel realities taking place in North Korean political prisons and reform institutes.
I am with you, Chairman, at the U.S. Congress as a witness to provide testimony for the third time today.
I am a Korean but I cannot work for the Korean people--for the human rights of the North Korean people in Korea.
Every time I appear before you I am full of a sense of shame.
South Korea is looking the other way as if the problem of human rights in North Korea is a thing happening in a far, far away land.
I do recognize and believe in the importance of economic exchange and mutual dialogue.
But without any progress in the human rights area, everything else will not succeed, will not prevail.
I wish to ask you in greatest sincerity once again to all who are present here today, I wish to ask you.
Perhaps it is out of place to make such a request because it's such a difficult and big request.
In order to see any progress in the North Korean human rights violations and North Korean repression of human rights, our efforts should not be a one-time political issue.
But I would ask you now to continue on until the day the problem of human rights in North Korea would end.
Page 126 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Chairman, thank you so much for allowing me to talk for a quite lengthy time.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Lee follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF SUN-OK LEE, FORMER PRISON AND CAMP SURVIVOR I was a normal gullible North Korean citizen, loyal to Leader and Party, and believed that North Korea was a people's paradise.
I was the Director of the Government Supply Office for party cadres for 14 years when I was arrested in 1984 under the false charge of embezzlement of state property.
I was subjected to severe torture during a 14-month preliminary investigation until I was forced to admit to the false charges against her.
Eventually, I received a term of 13 years in prison at a kangaroo court.
I had served 5 years and two months in prison when I was released in 1992 under a surprise amnesty.
During the first six months in the prison, I had worked briefly at all of the factories in the prison before I was finally assigned accounting work due to my background as an accountant.
My routine responsibilities included updating prisoners' list by deleting the dead from it and adding new arrivals to it, allocation of meals and work quotas, updating work accomplished, collecting daily work reports, carrying new work instructions to all work sites, and so on.
Thus, I had access to records of numbers of inmates and production plans, etc., and was privileged to daily visit all factories in the prison in both men's and women's sectors.
I survived her over five years of ordeal because of the opportunity to walk to all the work sites every day which other prisoners could not and because I had relatively easy work in an office as an accountant with the prison officials.
Page 127 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I surrendered to South Korea in December 1995 with my son Dong-chul Choi.
I published a book, The Bright Eyes of the Tailless Beasts in Seoul in December 1996 to inform the world of these crimes against humanity by the North Korean government.
With the help of a volunteer art student, I has produced the following illustrations to show the world the reality of the North Korean crimes against humanity.
In addition to the detention settlements for political prisoners, there are two or three secret political prisons.
Prisoners accused of violating policies of the party are imprisoned here through kangaroo court.
I was a prisoner at one of these political prisons.
I recollects life in the North Korean prison: ''A prisoner has no right to talk, laugh, sing or look in a mirror.
Prisoners must kneel down on the ground and keep their heads down deeply whenever called by a guard, they can say nothing except to answer questions asked.
Women prisoners' babies are killed on delivery.
Prisoners have to work as slaves for 18 hours daily.
Repeated failure to meet the work quotas means a week's time in a punishment cell.
A prisoner must give up her human worth.
When I was released, some 6,000 prisoners, both men and women, were crying and pleading with me in their hearts to let the outside world know of their suffering.
How can I ever forget their eyes, the eyes of the tailless beasts?'' After release, I could have lived peacefully in North Korea and enjoyed my previous status as a senior party member because people all knew that I was innocent.
However, I decided to risk my own life to inform the world of the Kim Jung II's crimes against humanity.
I testifies that most of the 6,000 prisoners who were there when I arrived in 1987 had quietly perished under the harsh prison conditions by the time I was released in 1992.
This shows that about 1,000 prisoners died each year and a fresh supply of new prisoners was obtained each year in order to meet the production quotas! I recalls that I was the only prisoner released during the term of my imprisonment.
The only exception I can recall is a group of some 250 prisoners, Koreans from Japan.
They had arrived there from Yodok detention settlement, I was told, several months before my arrival.
On the day of the 30th anniversary of the signing of agreement between North Korea and Japan for returning Korean residents from Japan to North Korea (shortly after her arrival at the prison), they were sent to an unknown location.
Page 128 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
NORTH KOREAN KANGAROO COURT EXPERIENCED BY SO LEE, FORMER FEMALE PRISONER OF A POLITICAL PRISON The preliminary trial was for 10:00 am at my former office, where I worked for 17 years as a loyal party member.
I asked for my husband before entering the court.
''Your husband is not here.
Don't ever try to meet anybody else, understand?'' was the reply.
Don't I even get to see my husband on the day of my trial? I met my lawyer for the first time in the courtroom.
The court consisted of a judge, prosecutor, lawyer and a two-member ''jury.''
My interrogator was there also.
The judge made a few remarks about the charges against me and asked me if I accepted the charge.
I had promised the interrogators earlier that I would accept the charge, but I simply could not control myself at that moment.
''Your Honor, I have neither embezzled government property nor violated any of the party policy.
Never, never! I am innocent.
Please allow me a fair investigation.''
The two guards at my sides shouted, ''You must be crazy!'' and started to kick me in the knees.
At that moment, the judge declared the preliminary trial closed.
The trial lasted less than 15 minutes! It was very cold on November 9, 1987, my trial day.
In the morning, the interrogators repeated their warning, ''You better be careful what you say in court or your husband and son will be in serious trouble.
Remember that!'' (I did not know that my husband, in fact, had already been exiled internally!) However, I was firmly determined to do what I could to prove my innocence to the party officials and my husband.
I was still so naive and excited by the idea of meeting my husband and telling him loudly, in the court room, all about my sufferings.
Page 129 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
After the preliminary trial which lasted less than 15 minutes, I was detained at the police cell for the formal trial until five o'clock in the afternoon.
I was given no water and food.
The interrogators persistently harassed me with the same threat, ''What about your husband and son? If you accept the charge in court, they will be safe.
Otherwise, you know what's going to happen to them.''
At court in the afternoon, I had to say yes when the judge asked me, ''Do you accept the charges against you?'' There was no evidence produced nor any witnesses against me.
The judge made no reference to the absence of evidence and witnesses and committed me to a 13-year imprisonment in violation of the government commercial policy and state property embezzlement.
The lawyer remained silent throughout the entire court proceeding.
The mere formality to send me to prison was thus over under the pretext of a trial.
UNDERGROUND EMERGENCY EXECUTION CHAMBER WITNESSED BY SO LEE, A FORMER FEMALE PRISONER Near the prison gate, there is a huge iron gate that leads to the underground tunnels.
Guards often remind the prisoners that their lives are considered disposable and that they can be collectively annihilated at any time in the underground tunnels.
The tunnels, of course, can be blasted at any time, leaving no traces of massacre.
It is said that the underground space is so large that it can accommodate several thousand prisoners at one time.
The male prisoners' sector has a huge underground factory for the production of ammunition and weapons.
I have never been to the underground weapon factory myself but I have frequently heard prison officials talking about it.
I do not know whether the underground tunnels in the women's sector are connected to the men's underground factory.
Page 130 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I often saw fumes coming from a distant chimney atop a nearby hill.
I was told that the chimney is one of the ventilators of the underground tunnels.
MEALS FOR PRISONERS WITNESSED BY SO LEE, FORMER FEMALE PRISONER OF A POLITICAL PRISON Salt soup 100 grams of broken corn, full meal 80 grams of broken corn, reduced for punishment 60 grams of broken corn, reduced for punishment PRISONERS' SLEEPING CONDITIONS WITNESSED BY SO LEE, FORMER FEMALE PRISONER OF A POLITICAL PRISON Some eighty to ninety prisoners sleep in a flea-infested chamber about six meters long by five meters wide (about 19 feet by 16 feet).
Some eighty percent of the prisoners are housewives.
The prison chamber is so congested that sleeping there is itself a torture.
Prisoners sleep on the floor, squeezed together, head and feet alternating.
So, prisoners sleep with the stinking feet of other prisoners right under their nose.
They roll up their clothes for pillows.
Page 131 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
During the winter, prisoners share body heat against the cold wind coming under the floor.
However, during the summer, it is so stuffy with the sweat and stink of the prisoners that they prefer sleeping at the work site even though it means more work.
Two prisoners must stand on night duty for one-hour shifts.
The following morning, prisoners on night duty must report to the prison authorities all the details of their duty including the sleep talking of other prisoners.
They get their duty hour extended if caught sleeping.
EVENING ROLL CALL WITNESSED BY SO LEE, FORMER FEMALE PRISONER OF A POLITICAL PRISON 90 
